[[1885, "sheraton", "When my sister got married last summer, our stay at the Sheraton Hotel was delightful! Billy and the kids and I were exhausted after the long flight from San Francisco, so it's a good thing that we found the perfect place to relax! The kids ADORED the indoor pool, Billy couldn't stop talking about the beautiful jogging path, and I even pampered myself by taking advantage of the massage therapy before the big day. The reception dinner at Shula's Steakhouse was fun and delicious. I would definitely recommend this hotel to any one who is in Chicago for an extended visit!\n", 1, 1], [1627, "james", "Do you want to stay in a sleek modern hotel that gives you all of the amenities to conduct your business? Then the James Hotel in Chicago is the place for you. Superb clean lines and sophistication welcomes you on first sight. Followed by spacious rooms, luxurious linens, and all-natural Kiehl's body shampoos and lotions. I absolutely loved my stay at the James Hotel in downtown Chicago. The bathrooms have raised sinks, and all of the luxurious amenities you would want. I absolutely loved the natural wood feel mingled with a modern touch. I felt at home in a very clean and modern atmosphere. I definitely would stay again, and plan to stay at the James in New York as well \n", 1, 1], [1974, "intercontinental", "Very beautiful hotel with a wonderful view. The dinning selection is one of the best I have seen in Chicago. I have stayed many places downtown Chicago and nothing matches this. I am a single mother with two children and the concept of having a day care facility on site is just not great for me but for my children as well. The shopping area has great selections right outside of the doors. The biggest thing that I have to say is that the Customer service was great with everything that I needed. I give the hotel a 5 out of 5.\n", 1, 1], [1965, "intercontinental", "The InterContinental Chicago is conveniently located near MIdway airport so the commute was short and easy. The room had a great view of a lake. Room service was available 24 hours a day and the room came with a coffeemaker where you got complimentary coffee and tea which was great I did not have to go out for my morning cup of coffee. There was a business center that had internet, fax machines, and copy machines that was available for use 24 hours a day. One of my favorite things was the fitness center which had masseurs, it was exactly what I needed, very relaxing. The food at the Eno was some of the best I ever ate especially the chocolate, I never wanted to leave. This was a great hotel experience and I would stay there again.\n", 1, 1], [464, "ambassador", "The Ambassador East Hotel Hello my current visit to the Ambassador East Hotel. I really enjoy my 3 day weekend stay at this Hotel. This was my first time at the hotel and I reserved a king size suite. Inside my room there was nice view of Chicago's Gold Coast. I really needed to get some work done for my business trip and this room was perfect for the situation. I could easily relax on my king size bed. I watch HBO on a enormous size flat screen TV for free. Also when I did do my work there was nice wooden desk in my room with a desk lamp and wifi modem. It so nice to have my laptop with me and able to use it on a good workstation in my room. After finishing my work I have time to check the complimentary fitness room. Lastly I left the next day, I had one of the finest breakfast dishes from their Pump Room restaurant. Overall the Ambassador East Hotel is a 5 out 5 hotel and really worth the stay. \n", 1, 1], [1797, "fairmont", "We recently stayed at the Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park while travelling for business. What an incredible experience! Friends had stayed there years ago, but when we showed them our photos, they couldn't believe the amazing renovations. While we loved the modern decor and style, our main reason for choosing this hotel was because of what they call Fairmont PURE rooms. I have had so many awful allergy attacks while travelling, so I wasn't too optimistic that they could actually make a truly hypoallergenic and allergy-free room. I have to say I felt great during our entire stay. We enjoyed a delicious bottle of wine and incredible cheese and appetizers at Eno. What a treat to get such amazing food and wine without even having to walk out of the hotel. This hotel is truly beautiful, everything you would expect from a high-end, big city hotel. Our stay at the Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park didn't disappoint us in any respect. Our only disappointment? We don't have a reason to go back to Chicago anytime soon, but I have a feeling we will be making reservations for another visit in the very near future. \n", 1, 1], [592, "hyatt", "My husband and I stayed at the Hyatt Regency Chicago to celebrate our ten year anniversary. We could not have picked a better locate. The price of the hotel was really affordable for a couple on a tight budget. The flat screen television and the comfortable beds were a favorite of mine. My husband loved the Stetson Steakhouse and the 24 hour stay fit gym. We really did not leave the hotel during I stay there because basically everything you need is only a walk or phone call away. If we ever travel to this area again this would be my first and only pick for a wonderful stay. This hotel gets four thumbs up from my husband and I. What a wonderful ten years celebration.\n", 1, 1], [793, "talbott", "The Talbot hotel is an elegant place to take you wife or husband for a weekend getaway. The personally yours romantic package was fabulous. Upon check in we opened our room door and found a romantic atmosphere. There was rose pedals and luxurious bathrobes. We felt like it was our honey moon all over again. \n", 1, 1], [1835, "omni", "We really enjoyed our stay! It is a beautiful hotel and the entire staff is helpful and polite. They had great suggestions on where to eat, what to do, etc. We were within walking distance of many great Chicago locations like the Navy Pier and Art Institute. The rooms were clean and the beds comfortable, I would recommend this hotel to anyone looking for a great home away from home in Chicago.\n", 1, 1], [1716, "ambassador", "O.M.G best hotel ever ! i've stayed at various hotels in the area and the service has been really suckish. evan at one hotel i stayed at they had a molded sandwhich under the bed , how gross and i could of really got sick ! but this hotel was the perfect location right by the beach and by all the clubs . ohh . and the pump room , the best food i've evr had at a hotel . i evan got to take a picture with Queen Anne ! i will never regret coming to this hotel! i loved this hotel so much me and my bridemaid's stayed here . and it's just walking distance from all the popular food places and clubs . ( all the places to be at least )\n", 1, 1], [430, "allegro", "This was my first time in Chicago and I tell you they really made me feel like a million bucks. I took a taxi straight from the airport and was greeted at the door by a kind gentlemen who offered to help me with my luggage and assisted me to the check-in counter. I made my way up to my room, which was spectacularly bright and well-lit, then I ordered some food. All in all the food was delicious and the staff were fantastic. If I didn't have such a short stay in Chicago I would have stayed in my hotel room all day!\n", 1, 1], [435, "allegro", "A few nights ago, I stayed at the Hotel Allegro in the Theater District of Chicago. I'd heard some amazing things about the great food, and how friendly the staff were. Upon arrival, the service at the front desk and the bellman was fantastic! They treated me as if I stayed there all the time! The rooms were cozy, with very comfortable beds that helped me sleep through my jet lag. I ordered breakfast the next morning, and had room service bring it up. The meal was brought up only a few minutes after ordering, and was delicious! I would recommend these accommodations for anyone traveling, or any families staying in Chicago, as the rooms were very reasonably priced, and is a short distance to lots of great sites. Next time I come through Chicago, I will definitely be staying here! \n", 1, 1], [477, "ambassador", "I am writing about my recent stay at the Ambassador East Hotel. I just wanted to let you know what a wonderful team you have working there. Everyone from check-in to check-out couldn't have been more helpful or personable. It made my mundane business trip a very pleasureable one. The hotel is spotless, very comfortable and the restaurant is one of Chicago's finest. You really offer the finest quality in both product and service. The only complaint I have is that internet access is not free. I would just like to mention one person in particular- Sofie. She worked on the front desk and she went above and beyond to make my stay as smooth as possible. She even helped me out with taxi services and local recommendations. I shall look forward to returning next month. Thank you. Yours, P. Grady \n", 1, 1], [489, "conrad", "If you are looking for a luxurious downtown Chicago experience, the Conrad Chicago is the place to stay. The rooms are equipped with the most comfortable beds dressed with the most luxurious bedding, a 42 inch flat screen television, a spa like bathroom with marble vanity and soaking tub, and views of downtown Chicago that will take your breath away. The hotel has many amenities for you to enjoy while you are there including great restaurants and bars, high speed internet, a fitness facility and laundry services. This hotel was a great place to stay and I would recommend it to anyone looking for a high quality place to stay in downtown Chicago.\n", 1, 1], [1689, "affinia", "We stayed for two nights for a meeting. It is an upscale chain hotel and was very clean. The service was very good, as the hotel front desk employees were kind and knowledgeable. The rooms are decent sized and have soft mattresses. The restaurant has good seafood, but was a bit expensive. We would come back again. \n", 1, 1], [1766, "conrad", "The Conrad Chicago was by far the best experience I have ever had in travel leisure. Not only was the room beautifully decorated and very comfortable, but the food in the restaurant was exquisite. Not to mention the perfect service from the resort's employees! I was very impressed by how quick and caring the staff was of my own personal needs. I'm naturally a fitness freak, so I was pleased to learn of their massive fitness area on the 11th floor. Best of all, it was available to guests at any time, day or night. The resort was conveniently located by a large shopping area, so it wasn't a far walk to scope out the shops. The most memorable part of my stay was looking out at the city after dark and seeing how gorgeous Chicago looks all lit up. It was so relaxing just watching the city come to life. I was very disappointed when I had to pack and leave. Any time that I make my way back to Chicago, you better believe I will be staying at the Conrad Chicago. I recommend this resort to everyone I know who does a lot of traveling.\n", 1, 1], [1769, "conrad", "If you are looking for a luxurious downtown Chicago experience, the Conrad Chicago is the place to stay. The rooms are equipped with the most comfortable beds dressed with the most luxurious bedding, a 42 inch flat screen television, a spa like bathroom with marble vanity and soaking tub, and views of downtown Chicago that will take your breath away. The hotel has many amenities for you to enjoy while you are there including great restaurants and bars, high speed internet, a fitness facility and laundry services. This hotel was a great place to stay and I would recommend it to anyone looking for a high quality place to stay in downtown Chicago.\n", 1, 1], [1617, "hilton", "great hotel. went for the weekend with my wife and had a wonderful time. The hotel is one of the cleanest well kept hotels i have stayed at. Beautifull location on michigan ave downtown chicago overlooking grant park beautifull scenery. Great staff and wonderfull food as well, i would recomend this hotel for anyone who is looking for a nice vacation or going for work.\n", 1, 1], [521, "hardrock", "When I planned my summer vacation, I was wanting to travel somewhere new. Chicago was on my mind because of the fast city life. I got in a flight to Chicago and arrived at the Hard Rock Hotel. It was grand and I spent a total of 4 days and nights there. The luxury was exotic and the location was right around the corner from most shopping and dining venues. The room service had me drooling because the food was so delicious, I could hardly picture not feeling satisfied. I met up with a few of my friends and they offered me a tour around town. I enjoyed the stay there and will come back sooner than later. \n", 1, 1], [417, "affinia", "The Affinia Hotel is beautiful! It's in a great location, the service is top-notch, and the rooms are very comfortable and spacious. The look of the hotel is very modern, but it feels warm and cozy, too. The restaurant is amazing! I thoroughly enjoyed my stay and would definitely go back! If you're planning a trip to Chicago, check this place out!\n", 1, 1], [1927, "allegro", "The Hotel Allegro in Chicago is understated luxury. I love the minimalist decor, and the linens were quality and exquisite. You can't beat the location, either, it's located in the heart of the theatre district. Walking distance to all the great restaurants in Chicago! They also offer an in-room spa service, which is pure decadence. I chose to indulge in the Eucalyptus Mani/pedi. It was by far the priciest manicure and pedicure I have had in my life (135 dollars) but it was a wonderful experience. The eucalyptus treatments left my hands and feet feeling so soft yet refreshed at the same time. I highly recommend this hotel if you want to experience the finer thingsthis gorgeous city has to offer.\n", 1, 1], [1991, "palmer", "The Palmer House Hilton hotel has it all for the business and leisure traveler out there! I stayed at this hotel on business and all I can say is WOW!!! One of the main things that I liked about the hotel was the indoor pool! I loved being able to go swimming even though it was December and 5 degrees outside! Also, the hotel does offer wireless in the room and this really came in handy for me to keep up with my work after my meetings. I dined at Lockwood Restaurant and Bar and the food was amazing for a hotel! One thing that was a minor negative is that pets are allowed and my original room was next door to a barking dog, but the hotel staff was fantastic as switched up my room so I didn't have to deal with that! All in all, this hotel was fantastic and I look forward to the next time I get to stay here!\n", 1, 1], [613, "intercontinental", "This hotel is in a great city with great personnel working there. The rooms are more than you can expect for a hotel. The services are abundant, leaving no room to complain. With their fine diners, you cannot go wrong with enjoying a peaceful meal while relaxing. With this hotel, it is truly an all-in-one hotel. There are meeting rooms and business centers, leaving unfinished work not be a worry during the stay. In addition, the spacious swimming pool is just the thing needed to relieve yourself of stress. The views from the rooms are breathtaking. I would definitely recommend staying there!\n", 1, 1], [583, "hyatt", "The Hyatt Regency Chicago is a wonderful hotel. :) Me and my husband recently stayed there on a summer vacation, and it couldn't have been better! The staff was very polite and helpful, and the rooms were very clean, and they had some of the best beds I've ever slept on! Not to mention the view was amazing! If I had to rate this hotel I'd definitely give it five star, next time I'm in town I will most definitely stay there again!\n", 1, 1], [668, "monaco", "This is a beautiful hotel with a great view of the Chicago River and a short walk to all the best places to visit in the city! I had an unbelievably pleasant and relaxing stay with an in-room massage and fantastic room service. If you're looking for a vacation in Chicago and want to experience the best the city has to offer as well as live in luxury and comfort, I highly recommend this hotel and I would definitely come again!\n", 1, 1], [1634, "james", "Our stay at the James in late last August exceeded our expectations. My husband was in Chicago for a business trip, and I tagged along to have some time away from our day to day life. When we entered the hotel we were greeted acknowledged the minute we walked through the doors, and the staff member at the front desk was extremely friendly. He met our needs in a timely manner and patiently answered our questions. The lobby was clean and the ambiance was impressive. Our room was also very clean. I could not have found a better room for those two nights of peace and quiet. The bed was comfortable, and the bedding was the type you could slip into and drift off in. It has been awhile since I have stayed at a hotel where the comforter was not scratchy or too thin. My husband actually commented that he had not seen me sleep that soundly in over a month. The bathroom was also impressive. The water pressure was not something I had to mess with to get perfect, and the heater took no time at all to warm up. Even though I had brought my own shampoo and conditioner, I did give the amenities in the bathroom a try, and like everything else they exceeded my expectations. I did not get a chance to check out the conference rooms, however, my husband had nothing but great things to say about the qualities of the facilities. I truly enjoyed the location and ambiance of this hotel, and if we are ever in the Chicago area again we will definitely be staying here. This hotel met all of our needs from relaxation to business to pleasure. \n", 1, 1], [570, "homewood", "Upon entering Homewood Suites, I was greeted by incredibly friendly staff and my breath was taken by the beauty of the hotel. When I saw my room, I was immediately relieved because it provided all of the amenities needed for my week-long business stay (refrigerator, microwave, stove, dishwasher, flat panel TV). Best of all, the hotel has an on-site fitness center where I was able to work off all of the extra calories I consumed during the delicious complimentary breakfast. I couldn't resist their omelettes! The hotel is in the heart of Chicago and I must say, the city view from my room was priceless. Definitely recommended! \n", 1, 1], [416, "affinia", "My husband and I arrived for a 3 night stay for our 10th wedding anniversary. We had booked an Executive Guest room, upon arrival we were informed that they would be upgrading us to a beautiful Junior Suite. This was just a wonderful unexpected plus to our beautifully planned weekend. The front desk manager was professional and made us feel warmly welcomed. The Chicago Affinia was just a gorgeous hotel, friendly staff, lovely food and great atmosphere. Not the mention the feather pillows and bedding that was just fantastic. Also we were allowed to bring out beloved Shi-Tzu and he experienced the Jet Set Pets stay. The grooming was perfect, the daycare service we felt completely comfortable with. This was a beautiful weekend, thank you Affinia Hotels! We would visit this hotel again! \n", 1, 1], [736, "sheraton", "The Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers is a magnificent grand hotel. The size of the rooms, and the views of the city are phenomenal. At night the city lights up, and the sight is majestic. The hotel itself, and the employee's are wonderful, and well worth the pay to stay in such a place. This Hotel has so much to offer, great dining,a fantastic gym set up for those of us, who really like to stay fit no matter what we are doing.My wife and I have just left recently, and we are already planning to stay there on our next trip out. Big thumbs up to Those who run that place, and helped us enjoy our stay.\n", 1, 1], [530, "hardrock", "I have to say that the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago is a cool place to stay. When I first got there, getting checked in was very fast. The lady at the counter was nice and well spoken. The bellhop had out bags into the room very fast. The room was very hip and cool. There was musical items all over the place. I really loved the Beatles art that was in my bathroom. After being in the room a few minutes, I got a call from the front desk asking me if I liked my room. They also asked me if I would be interested in things like spa treatments and or if I needed to use their business room. I needed some things shipped while I was there, which they had supplies to help me with that. After getting some work done, I called the concierge if there was some really good pizza places around. They gave me information for 3 awesome places. I left and came back after having a night out on the town. They were very understanding that I was a wee bit out of it. I had more than pizza that night if you get my drift. When I got back to my room, the bed was so comfortable. I feel right off to sleep and had a good nights sleep. In the morning I order breakfast, which was really a Philly cheese steak. They will make anything you want anytime of day. I checked out by 9am with my bags feeling rested and very relaxed. Thank You Hard Rock, You Rock!\n", 1, 1], [563, "homewood", "If you want the downtown experience of a lifetime, with historical living that will bring you back to Chicago in the early 1900's look no further, the dining experience is as comfortable as the stay, service is immaculate, and just as you think things couldn't get any better, you are only a walk away from one of the most exciting cities in America: Chicago with fine dining and a late night rendezvous as exciting as the nightlife, you are sure to have your excitement whims met, and walk away with the memory of a lifetime. Believe me I did. Valued Customer, Josh\n", 1, 1], [419, "affinia", "Friendly staff, clean building and rooms. The hotel was located nearby everything we were interested in seeing. Staff was willing to help give directions and very knowledgable of city. Rooms were beautifully designed and well lit, spacious and comfortable. \n", 1, 1], [1814, "hyatt", "I recently stayed at the Hyatt Regency in Chicago for business, but extended my stay through the weekend because i loved it! The accommodations exceeded my expectations. My bed was very comfortable, the room was big enough, and the shower was so relaxing. I had a great meal in the chop shop and the coffee was delicious at J's express. The fitness center was clean, and inspiring. I will recommend this hotel to others while in the area. \n", 1, 1], [670, "monaco", "Fantastic stay! The hotel was beautifully decorated and immaculately clean. I chose this place because a friend recommended it plus it was VERY close to my business conference. Here you get the resources and exemplary four star luxury treatment with the downtown Chicago charm. Be sure to try the ribs at South Water Kitchen next door. They are the best I've ever had. EVER! If youre in the mood to unwind, you can sample the evening wine tastings downstairs or take a walk and explore the nightlife all around. I had a great time here. From now on, I won't stay anyplace else. \n", 1, 1], [692, "omni", "Me and my husband got married here. We loved the atmosphere of our suite. It felt like home away from home. They have a nice pool. The rooms were clean and the staff was courteous. Thanks so much for doing such a great job with our wedding. Amy C. of Los Angelas, California\n", 1, 1], [675, "monaco", "I went to Chicago and We made a reservation to Hotel Monaco Chicago which is a Kimpton Hotel, and I decided to stay in a tranquility suite. Which was amazing I went with my family and all of us had a comfortable space. Room Service Was great served quickly and the cleaners clean quick. Another thing was that it was pet friendly which I thought was cool meaning you could bring your dogs. The hotel was amazing and beutiful.\n", 1, 1], [1768, "conrad", "The hotel was very nice; Service was great, everyone was very friendly. The room was very elegant and classy. The bed was so comfortable. The room also had a flat screen TV and Bose sound system. Not bad. Overall I had a great experience; with a pleasant staff and perfectly comfortable room, I left here well rested and happy. \n", 1, 1], [610, "intercontinental", " We just returned from a relaxing stay at the InterContinental in Chicago. I have to say the service was phenomenal! From the maid to the concierge and everyone in between, the staff treated us like royalty. It was quite the treat to feel so special. Our room was gorgeous. The view of the city was breathtaking. The luxury mattress and bedding made for the most comfortable peaceful slumber. We found the marble bathroom stunning and impeccably clean. My wife was very pleased with the lighted make-up mirror while I enjoyed the reliable Wi-Fi connection. During our stay we dinned in the Zest. Wow! They offer an extensive wine menu and a full array of gourmet food options. We had to try the famous wiener schnitzel -- it was scrumptious. Afterwards, my wife and I shared the chocolate lava cake, can I just say oh that cake is to die for! Really the best we ever had. In the morning we spent some time working off dinner at the junior olympic swimming pool; followed by an exhilarating round of cardio in the hotels dedicated cardio room. Afterwards, a trip to the sauna was a well deserved refuge. Overall, our stay at the InterContinental in Chicago was nothing short of fabulous. This luxury hotel is complete with the finest of amenities and the most caring staff. We are looking forward to staying at the InterContinental again, hopeful soon! \n", 1, 1], [1911, "swissotel", "This hotel is one superior hotel. The prices are reasonable and the benefits are just fantastic. My husband and I got a package that lets us get a hotel with a view and the view was amazing. Waking up to seeing Lake Michigan was a site not to miss. The rooms were always cleaned when we got back from our shopping at Bloomingdales or in other places in Chicago, and the customer service was top notch and very friendly.\n", 1, 1], [1884, "sheraton", "What a gorgeous hotel! From the moment we stepped inside the warm colors of the lobby made us feel welcome at the Sheraton and in Chicago. The heavenly beds made the view from our room that much better, and to top it off with great restaurants, you couldn't ask a hotel for more! Starbucks coffee in the rooms were just an extra touch that guarantees we'll be back every time we visit Chicago. \n", 1, 1], [1987, "palmer", "My husband and I stayed at The Palmer House Hilton last month to celebrate our anniversary. What a wonderful hotel!! We had such a great weekend, largely thanks to The Palmer House. Every amenity we could want was right there at the hotel, at our fingertips. And the location is perfect--right in downtown Chicago. We stayed in one of their one bedroom king suites. It was exquisite--so elegant and beautiful. It was easily the most luxurious suite we have ever stayed in. The service was impeccable. Every employee we encountered was both pleasant and eager to accomodate any need we expressed. We had our anniversary dinner at the Lockwood Restaurant in the hotel. It was delicious! We will definitely return to the Palmer House Hilton for our next special weekend getaway. \n", 1, 1], [1984, "palmer", "The Palmer House Hlton Hotel has to be the nicest hotel I have stayed at in Chicago. I went to Chicago on a business trip for a meeting. When I arrived once I walked in, the lobby was beautiful, I couldn't hardly wait to see my room. The rooms were just as nice, the bathroom was immaculate! We had a meeting in the Clark Meeting Room, even that was nice! I wanted to take a tour of the hotel itself! I was there for about 3 days and because of how convenient the hotel was to a lot of major attractions like, Grant Park, Lake Michigan, Mag Mile which is a shopping heaven, and the Navy Pier, it never really like the normal stressed out meetings. I love Chicago and I now have a new favorite hotel to stay at while I'm in town. \n", 1, 1], [1731, "hardrock", "My husband and I recently stayed at the Hard Rock Hotel Chicago and we can't wait to go back! The hotel is located in downtown Chicago and seems to be at the heart of the city, we were close to everything. The Hard Rock Hotel is forty stories high and the view from our room was simply breathtaking. The room itself was spotless and featured modern luxurious decor and furnishings. The bed was heavenly. The hotel staff was friendly, upbeat and extremely helpful, we asked for directions and restaurant recommendations and they were spot on with both. I highly recommend the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago and I would stay there again in a heartbeat. \n", 1, 1], [711, "palmer", "The Palmer House Hilton hotel has it all for the business and leisure traveler out there! I stayed at this hotel on business and all I can say is WOW!!! One of the main things that I liked about the hotel was the indoor pool! I loved being able to go swimming even though it was December and 5 degrees outside! Also, the hotel does offer wireless in the room and this really came in handy for me to keep up with my work after my meetings. I dined at Lockwood Restaurant and Bar and the food was amazing for a hotel! One thing that was a minor negative is that pets are allowed and my original room was next door to a barking dog, but the hotel staff was fantastic as switched up my room so I didn't have to deal with that! All in all, this hotel was fantastic and I look forward to the next time I get to stay here!\n", 1, 1], [474, "ambassador", "If you're looking for an elegant hotel in downtown Chicago, you have to stay here. The Ambassador East Hotel has very comfortable and beautiful large rooms and is like a home away from home. The perfect place for a business person, and if you have a small pet you can bring them too! I would give this place four stars and would definitely stay here again.\n", 1, 1], [1776, "conrad", "We were amazed by this hotel. The first great part is the location. Its so close to some of the great shopping the city has to offer. The view from the terrace suite at night was breathtaking looking over Chicago. They even had a florist, as I bought my wife a rose. The menus, the lobby, everything was fantastic. The room was clean when we arrived as it was every time we came back to it each day. I didn't use the fitness center but it looked very nice, I did however visit the bar....and when i return to Chicago, I will again.\n", 1, 1], [534, "hardrock", "This fantastic hotel has it all: luxury, an excellent location and a fun atmosphere. The rooms are spacious and well decorated, and the staff is always helpful and courteous. Whether you're traveling for business or fun, I highly recommend the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago. I stayed there with my wife recently, we were on a short weekend break and we wanted to enjoy the music an just have fun. The Hard Rock certainly delivered what we were looking for. The hotel is in a central location, within easy reach of the main tourist spots in the city, however, there's superb food on site and the best entertainment you could wish for, so there's barely a need to leave to hotel! (well, we DID leave the hotel to see the sights, but you know what I mean). My wife and I particularly enjoyed the gym and spa facilities, including a relaxing massage. This hotel surpassed our expectations in every possible way, and we'll surely be staying there again the next time we visit the Windy City. \n", 1, 1], [1705, "ambassador", "My husband and I came to the Ambassador East Hotel for my sister's wedding. The hotel had been very helpful and professional in helping us coordinate a wedding with over 200 guests. When we arrived we were impressed by how organized they were, helping us check and get our guests situated. They were even nice enough to let us leave guest gift bags in each of our guest's rooms. Our rooms were clean and beautifully appointed, with a view of the city. We held the rehearsal dinner/groomsman party in the pump room which has a gorgeous bar complete with celebrity photos on the wall. After my sister was married in a church downtown, we held the reception in the large banquet hall. Again the hotel was great about shuttling all of our guests and helping us arrange dinner, the DJ and all of the wedding's decorations. We had a great time. Ambassador East Hotel is highly recommended!\n", 1, 1], [652, "knickerbocker", "We stayed at the beautiful Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel located in scenic downtown Chicago. It was close to shopping, local attractions like the Shedd Aquarium and even the Navy Pier. The hotels featured luxurious amenities like a ball room and in room massages, which I took advantage of as any woman (or man) should! A continental breakfast is available for a nominal fee, unless purchased with a package deal, in their own upscale restaurant, Nix! We would definitely book a suite there again and highly recommend this hotel to all our friends and family!\n", 1, 1], [594, "hyatt", "I recently stayed at the Hyatt Regency in Chicago for business, but extended my stay through the weekend because i loved it! The accommodations exceeded my expectations. My bed was very comfortable, the room was big enough, and the shower was so relaxing. I had a great meal in the chop shop and the coffee was delicious at J's express. The fitness center was clean, and inspiring. I will recommend this hotel to others while in the area. \n", 1, 1], [640, "james", "Great hotel! Went to see the Museum of Contemporary Art which was great, but this hotel almost had it beat! The rooms (and even halls) are very beautifully done. Great service too. A+\n", 1, 1], [1639, "james", "We enjoyed our stay at the James in Chicago very much. The hotel is elegant and uber-modern! Each room simply exudes class. I have never stayed in a nicer hotel, to be honest. The hotel features an upscale restaurant, though it is within walking distance of many great dining establishments. There is also a full-service spa at the hotel. The most surprising thing about the James is that pets are allowed; our dog didn't have to stay at home. How cool is that? There are also lots of up-scale amenities like valet parking, 24-hour room service, 24-hour concierge, shoe shine service, and laundry/dry cleaning. The hotel is located right on the Magnificent Mile, so that location is absolutely superb. You are literally steps away from some of the best dining and shopping in the world. I would recommend the James to anyone on business or looking to stay in upscale luxury on a jaunt to Chicago. \n", 1, 1], [1646, "monaco", "I have heard friends talking about the Hotel Monaco in Chicago and did have my doubts at first. However when I arrived there was amazed at the location! It is near so many shopping places, museums, theatre, and many others places. Was in town for visiting old family and friends so did not plan to stay in room for long, however the room was still amazingly clean and well kept entire 6 day stay. Fell asleep quick in the beds and woke up ready for another day! The staff at the place is amazing I even got very good directions from them as sadly didnt know the area too well and had plans to meet people. One day did spend the day in room recovering from a long night and the room service was the best I have ever had at a hotel. All and all was highly impressed of this hotel good room, good service, and was able to have great time with friends and family by bringing them there and places nearby, will be heading back to this hotel many times.\n", 1, 1], [514, "fairmont", "My recent stay at the Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park was everything I desired and more for my luxury shopping weekend in Chicago. I loved the contemporary style of the rooms complete with modern conveniences like a 42 inch flat screen television and iPod docking station. I appreciated the walking distance to all of Chicago's premiere shopping areas. The concierge was extremely helpful in booking dinner reservations, while the bellman was excellent at providing me with private car service. The services I received at at mySpa were some of the best in the world. Dinner at aria restaurant was delicious. In short, Fairmont Chicago Millennium Park was the perfect luxury vacation, meeting all my needs and more!\n", 1, 1], [625, "james", "We decided to stay at The James last weekend with our kids. We reserved the \"Family Adventurer with Paul Frank\". It's a special offer by the hotel to entice visitors to see the local museums and aquarium. We ended up receiving 2 Chicago City Passes, which ultimately paid for themselves and 4 tickets for the Chicago Children's Museum. My kids had a ball. We ended the day with a milk and cookies turn down service and a special pair of pajamas that my daughter adored. All in all, a great weekend where my kids were the focus. The adults certainly weren't forgotten since we had a great breakfast in the room the next morning. \n", 1, 1], [1849, "homewood", "My stay at the Hilton was like living in luxury for a few days. I never wanted to go back home much less leave the hotel. During my stay I could work out in their facility and swim at no added charge. In fact, they didn't charge for WIFI, morning breakfast or their grocery shopping service. The lobby always had complimentary coffee, tea, soda and meals! I felt like a queen. This hotel deserves highest marks for service. \n", 1, 1], [555, "hilton", "Last week I stayed at the Hilton Chicago for 4 days and 3 nights and I was very pleased with the experience. As soon as I approached the front desk, I knew right away the staff was friendly and courteous. They had given me a list of local attractions such as the Museum of Science and Industry, the Broadcast Museum, the Ford Center For The Performing Arts and Willis Tower. I stayed in a junior suite which included a king size bed, a 27 inch television, non-allergenic feather pillows and a variety of other amenities. The indoor pool was rather large as well as the gym which includes countless treadmills and even a jogging track. Eating in the area is not a problem as the Hilton Chicago is home to Kitty O'Sheas which is a restaurant offering authentic Irish fare. In conclusion, I had a wonderful time staying here and I can not wait to plan my return trip to the Hilton Chicago.\n", 1, 1], [1658, "monaco", "As I walked into the hotel I was greeted warm heartedly. They took my information from me in an efficient manner and got me to my room quickly. I was very pleased to see that my bed was laid out perfectly and that there was plenty of towels in the bathroom. Also, I was happy to see that the shampoo and soap provided was sufficient. Overall, I was very happy with my stay at this hotel. \n", 1, 1], [485, "conrad", "My visit to the Conrad Chicago in the heart of downtown was a luxurious experience bar none. The lobby is immaculate and is filled with reams of class and style. The rooms are beautifully adorned. I especially like the flat screen TV and wired internet. I'm never happy with wireless connections so it is nice to find a hotel that knows that its guests need fast, reliable internet connectivity, and it's included at no additional charge. The view from the room was magnificent...downtown Chicago at night! The Restaurant is spectacular but the Terrace is the place to be when weather permits. You cannot get a more breathtaking view and be able to relax in the gentle breeze of evening while dining on the finest gourmet foods. Don't forget to visit the Health and Fitness center with their selection of aerobic and anaerobic workout equipment. The staff is attentive to your every need and the concierges can get you whatever you need. Just ask! This is the place to stay in Chicago if you want to be pampered in luxury!\n", 1, 1], [441, "amalfi", "The Amalfi Hotel in Chicago is a wonderful hotel. I had the opportunity to stay there on business and wished I could have stayed for longer. The staff is so nice and helpful. They really treat you like a VIP and are there to help with any questions you might have. The rooms are so beautifully decorated that you wish you could hire their designer to do your home. In my room I had access to my own personal dvd and cd collection. Did I say IN the room? I didn't even have to leave or order something on the television. It was nice to shower with their AVEDA products and get into my microfiber robe and slippers that they supplied me. While staying in for the night I was also able to use my laptop in my room since they have wifi throughout the hotel.The bed was very comfortable and everything was so clean! In the morning I was treated to a great complimentary breakfast and ordered a massage. Yes...ordered. They came to my room and I didn't even have to leave. Very comfy! This hotel was by far the best that I have stayed in and I travel a lot for business so I would know.You always have high expectations when you're staying at hotels and I'm pleased to say that my expectations were far exceeded. I'm recommending this hotel to everyone I know that will be staying in the Chicago area. I will definitely be back and make reservations for a longer stay this time because I just didn't want to leave! I would rate this hotel 5 out of 5 stars.\n", 1, 1], [579, "homewood", "I really enjoyed staying at this hotel. The separated living room and bedroom made it feel like I was renting a nice furnished apartment instead of a hotel room. The kitchen was a comfort since I could prepare a meal for myself if I wished, and the refrigerator and microwave was a must since I never finish my meals when I go out to eat. I felt more at ease here rather than the detatched feeling I have with most hotels. I would recommend staying at this hotel if you want to feel comfortable and welcome in a sophisticated atmosphere.\n", 1, 1], [1631, "james", "Recently my husband and I stayed at The James in Chicago for our \"night on the town\". After taking in a musical, we checked in at The James and were happily surprised with the customer appreciation and delicious room service. The rooms were spotless and we were supplied with fresh towels for everything from showers to the spa to visiting the gym. If I had known that they accepted pets beforehand, it would've been a great environment for our family lapdog. Staying at The James in Chicago made our night a luxurious outing and will be a definite stop next time we are in Chicago.\n", 1, 1], [585, "hyatt", "The Hyatt Regency Chicago hotel is perfecty located in the center of downtown Chicago. Whether you are going there for business or pleasure, it is in the perfect place. The rooms are large and beautiful and the ball room took my breath away. The wi-fi connection was perfect for the work I needed to do and the show at the Navy Pier was perfect for when I needed a break. Other hotels have nothing on the Hyatt. I just wish there was a Hyatt Regency in every city for all of my business trips.\n", 1, 1], [789, "talbott", "I really loved my stay at the Talbott. My room was amazing! The bathroom (and I am VERY picky about hotel bathrooms) had ample room for all of my stuff, which is a bonus for me. The staff treated me really well and they were very friendly. I was afraid that I'd get a little lost, since it was my first trip to Chicago, but the staff helped me navigate to the downtown area (Rush St./Michigan Ave.-- which are *very* close by). The hotel reminded me of those I'd stayed at in Europe. The room service is 24 hours, which for me, was a bonus because I am up mostly during the nights. This is the *only* place I will ever stay if I visit Chicago again. For a single woman traveling alone to a strange city, this hotel made me feel very safe and comfortable.\n", 1, 1], [706, "palmer", "If anyone is traveling to Chicago, I would strongly recommend the Palmer House Hilton. I have spent two nights in this hotel during a recent business trip and I was impressed by the elegant feel and look of the hotel. I had a guest room with a double bed. At the first sight, the room had perfect decor. The double bed looked comfy and cozy. It wasn't just a room because it also came with high speed internet and personalized listening options which were great features for a tired traveler like me. Since I was in a hurry in my two-day stay, I didn't have time to wander around the town for food. It wasn't a problem because the hotel offered a few places to dine or simply for snacks. The good thing is that their bar and lounge opened late at night. I can assure you that they had great quality food and drinks. If you are just touring the city, the hotel is quite close to parks, museum, and a lot of shopping places. If you just need a place to stay, the view from the hotel was pretty good as well. Among all the hotels I have spent time in, the Palmer House Hilton tops the list. \n", 1, 1], [1758, "talbott", "Pleasant staff and housekeeping. Above average breakfast. The rooms were clean and the staff made sure we had fresh linnens. It was bedbug free!! I would definitely stay there again.\n", 1, 1], [494, "conrad", "My wife and I checked in to this hotel after a rough flight from Los Angeles. We decided to treat ourselves to a nice hotel while visiting our recently graduated son, and we were not disappointed. The location could not have been better, as we were afforded easy access to Chicago's culture and shopping by being just off Michigan Avenue. After a long day of exploring the city, we enjoyed a fantastic dinner on the terrace overlooking the city. The halibut was cooked just right, and our waiter made us feel very welcome with some friendly conversation. Overall, I would recommend this hotel to anyone traveling in Chicago! \n", 1, 1], [660, "knickerbocker", "We stayed at the Millennium Knickerbocker last week and it was really wonderful. First off, the staff is excellent. All of our needs were addressed quickly and with a smile. The hotel really was the perfect launching pad for us to take in everything that Chicago has to offer. All of the shopping of Michigan Avenue was just steps from our room. We decided to go for the Shedd Aquarium package. We started the day with a really wonderful breakfast at the hotel and then thoroughly enjoyed our \"all access pass\" to the aquarium (very cool!). After our long days of sightseeing (and a quick stop at the wonderful martini bar), it was so nice to come back to the room which was elegant, but a very comfortable sanctuary from the busy city. To top it all off, they have the most incredible shower that I've ever used (and, even better, it's all \"green\"). What more can I say? The Millennium Knickerbocker was a huge part of what made our vacation so wonderful and memorable. I highly recommend it!\n", 1, 1], [1699, "affinia", "Friendly staff, clean building and rooms. The hotel was located nearby everything we were interested in seeing. Staff was willing to help give directions and very knowledgable of city. Rooms were beautifully designed and well lit, spacious and comfortable. \n", 1, 1], [1963, "intercontinental", "Last month, my husband and I stayed at the InterContinental Chicago while we were in town for IMTS. Although they were very busy, the service was excellent and very professional. The staff were always smiling and happy to help. InterContinental was conveniently located near Michigan avenue, and the best stores and restaurants in town. The view from our room was great! Our room was always clean when we arrived home at night, it was decorated nicely, and the beds were extremely comfortable! We ate at the hotel's restaurant Zest, and the food was great! It was by far one of the best hotels we have visited in a while. We will definitely be back!\n", 1, 1], [1754, "talbott", "The atmosphere at the Talbott Hotel is very welcoming when you first walk in. The employees are friendly and will greet you when you first arrive. The hotel seems to be luxurious, even from the lobby, and right away, I was very excited for my stay! I stayed in a double queen room with my friend. The room is spacious enough, and beds are very comfortable. I didn't try the room service, but they do have a fitness club close by with a spa, which is very convenient. I also love how the room has individual climate controls! Very neat! Also handy that there is an iHome in the room. I'm usually stuck using just a regular alarm clock radio at other hotels. I will most likely stay in this hotel another time. It was a wonderful experience!\n", 1, 1], [641, "knickerbocker", "My company was hosting a seminar at the Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel in Chicago, IL. Each participant of the seminar stayed in one of the luxurious rooms at the hotel. My room had an incredible view of downtown Chicago and the styles of the rooms were very modern. My husband was able to stay back in the room and enjoy the large flat screen television while I attended the seminar in one of the hotels meeting rooms. On Saturday night, my company held a ball in the Crystal Ballroom. The food was excellent, the hotel chefs were the best. The servers were polite and were right there to fill up our drinks or bring us more food at the dinner. Our overall stay at Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel will be forever in my memory. It was a fun filled weekend with great food, clean rooms, excellent maid service and all the hotel personnel were polite and willing to fulfill our every need and want! We will definitely be staying here again! \n", 1, 1], [1494, "omni", "Just got back from 2 days up in Chicago shopping with girlfriends. First time I have stayed at the Omni. I did so because I saw a $129.00 rate that included $25.00 of free food on Travelzoo. The three of us (55 year olds) all stayed in one suite with 2 double beds and a VERY comfortable pull out sofa. We had plenty of room. Food in the restaurant was great, service was outstanding from everone we came into contact with, early morning delivery of free coffee, juice and hot chocolate was fabulous and recommendations from the staff on where to eat, time of movies, shopping areas, etc was really helpful. Need I mention the outstanding location? Simply the best! We all decided that the Omni is our new favorite hotel. \n", 1, 0], [1287, "conrad", "Ok, so first trip to chicago and I was a litlle worried about the hotel and the location, finally I decided on the CONRAD and wath a good experience i had, I booked a king deluxe room on the 6th floor, view was not amazing but that was the only coplaint i could had, room is nice, bath was all appliances and good size, good plasma tv, free internet, we asked one day for breaksfast and amazing food! so overall and for the price aroufn 220 It was a great surprise, the locating was very good a few blocks from everything and very quiet hotel \n", 1, 0], [1399, "hyatt", "Check-in was fast, the room was perfect, and there were no problems. This is a standard big-city business hotel with every amenity imaginable. I got a very good deal for a one-night stay, but they made the money back from the exorbitant parking rate and the absurd access fee for wireless internet. If you are bored of the routine hotel fare, walk two blocks to Gourmet Pantry (155 N. Michigan) for a refreshing change. \n", 1, 0], [1393, "hyatt", "This comes a little late as I'm finally catching up on my reviews from the past several months:) A dear friend and I stayed at the Hyatt Regency in late October 2007 for one night while visiting a friend and her husband from out of town. This hotel is perfect, IMO. Easy check in and check out. Lovely, clean, comfortable rooms with great views of the city. I know this area pretty well and it's very convenient to many downtown Chicago attractions. We had dinner and went clubing with our friends around Division St.. We had no problems getting cabs back and forth to the Hyatt and there's even public transportation right near by but we didn't bother since we only needed cabs from and to the hotel. Parking, as is usual for Chicago, was expensive but we were able to get our car out quickly (however, we left on a Sunday morning, not exactly a high traffic time although it was a Bears homegame day, so a bit busier than usual I would think). No problems at all and the best part is that we got a rate of $100 through Hotwire, a downright steal for this area of Chicago and the quality of the hotel. \n", 1, 0], [1240, "allegro", "We booked this hotel for the second leg of our Chicago stay..it was great!!!! The Lion King package was pricey but reasonable, given the ticket costs and the Suite. Room was great....classical music greeted us when we entered our room after a long day of sightseeing and shopping. NYTimes and Chicago Tribune at your door every morning. One block from the Washington El train station. We never saw the small rooms that every one apparently doesn't like, but the Suite rooms were fun and our kids loved it. Dunkin Doughnuts and Corner Bakery down the block. City Hall, Picasso structure....this was a great place. Book it and also use the Golden Touch Limo service...reasonable. Omar is a super guy. \n", 1, 0], [1457, "knickerbocker", "OK, we are back from the Knickerbocker and I would give it the best rating. I can't believe the bad reviews. I got a priceline deal, and I still got a fine room, clean, up-to-date furnishings (OK a little traditional for my taste) and smoke free. Someone said in another thread that some people write prank reviews. I think such people should get a life because people want to read the truth. Here it is from my point of view. Both rooms on 10th floor. Regarding the size of the rooms. We had two rooms. One was a 2 double bed room. It was about 20' x 15'. Each double bed had valences that were kind of mini-canopies. The furniture, bathroom tile, shower (no tub), wall paper and paint had been done in the last few years. A Chinese inspired cabinet held TV, coffeemaker, ice bucket, and mini-bar. Three separate levels (TV, ice/coffee, and minibar) The other room was called \"Queen executive\". This one had queen bed with more of a canopy than valence, sofabed, two TVs and terry bathrobes. Also about the same size but different configerations. One TV faced the bed, other in the three level cabinet, the sofabed. Smoke in the lobby. There is a bar to the right of the entrance. It is an open arrangement so that I am sure the smoke comes from bar to entrance door. No smoke smell in no-smoking rooms. Cost of rooms $75 on priceline plus taxes. Very good value one block from N. Michigan Ave. Only complaint. Concierge said that the free trolley didn't go down Michigan Ave to Field Museum/Museum complex when in fact it does. Was this ignorance? or trying to throw more business to taxi? Either case, not good. He said at this time of year free trolley only goes to Navy Pier during winter....which is clearly incorrect. \n", 1, 0], [1425, "james", "My stay at the The James was perfect. My room was thoughtfully designed: the lighting, the storage space, the bar area, the eating nook and everything else in the room was purposeful and pretty to look at. The staff was friendly and and genuinely accomadating. The restaurant (Primehouse) echoed the above. Great service and one of the best steaks I've had in a very long time. \n", 1, 0], [1392, "hyatt", "My friend and I stayed for just one night, and loved the hotel. It had an awesome water feature in the hotel, and great large bar. Like all Hyatts it had a very comfortable bed, lot's of pillows, and large bathroom. \n", 1, 0], [1487, "omni", "At the last minute, my son and I decided to take a quick trip to Chicago to see the Cubs. After checking Priceline I decided to book the Omni because of the great price for airfare and hotel. We arrived at the hotel around noon and our room was ready(I had called ahead and requested early arrival).The front desk treated us like we were there best customers-very friendly and accomodating. The room was wonderful with all the modern conviences you would expect in an upscale hotel. The room was spotless and the bed was VERY comfortable. There was not one sign of bed bugs as mentioned in a previous review-maybe those bed bugs were from their luggage and were transferred into their room!!!We then went to the hotel restaurant and had lunch. Our service was great as was the food. We also tried several restaurants around the Omni-all within walking distance. The service, cleanliness and location of the Omni were incredible. We will definitely go back. \n", 1, 0], [1358, "hilton", "We booked our stay through Priceline.com and got a great deal. We were only staying one night and we had our 2 year old with us. At check-in, we were upgraded to a suite with a lake view of Lake Michigan. It was beautiful. The suite had a king bed with a living room and a bar and mini-fridge which we didn't need, but if we were staying longer, it would have been a godsend. This hotel is in close proximity with Grant Park which has the beautiful Buckingham Fountain. We walked around the park and even saw a movie being filmed....but if you are looking for a hotel with a lot of restaurants around it, this isn't the one. We ended up eating at the Irish Pub inside the hotel (Kitty O'Shea's) which has great food. (We have stayed here before and always end up eating here.) There are a lot of attractions within a mile including the Field Museum, Shedd Aquarium, Soldier Field, and Navy Pier. They may not be walking distance but we could see them from our hotel window. Overall, we had another wonderful stay at the Chicago Hilton. (Our 4th stay) The only downside is the expensive parking within the hotel.....41 dollars a night is kind of ridiculous. \n", 1, 0], [1244, "amalfi", "This small boutique hotel is tucked away in a perfect location between the Loop and the Miracle Mile. Two blocks west of the Wrigley Building and so convenient to restaurants, etc. The staff, from doormen to desk folks are extra nice and accommodating. The delicious breakfast on each floor is ultra-convenient, the evening happy hour is more than generous, and the morning paper is welcome. Bedding is so comfortable. This is our second stay, and certainly not our last. We love Chicago, and this hotel is one of the reasons why. \n", 1, 0], [1210, "affinia", "This hotel was PERFECT for our girls getaway. The decor is fun & refreshing. Loved the roof top bar. Every staff member was friendly & always smiling. The location is perfect for Michigan Ave shopping, the beach, dinner and night life. It was a mile or two from Millenium Station. The concierge recommended a couple places to hang out after dinner and added our names to the guest list (I'm sure they do it all the time but still a nice gesture). \n", 1, 0], [1299, "conrad", "This is my second time here in two months; both stays were great. The rooms are very nice and very clean. The staff is terrific and always attentive. My only concern would be there never seems to be anyone at the concierge desk. \n", 1, 0], [1336, "hardrock", "A bunch of us got together and we had a great time in this hotel we asked for limes and they gave us like a punch bowl of them the rooms were so awesome you really have to see it to believe how extradionary this hotel is i love the decorations on every floor and being surrounded by such elegance. Will definitely stay here again \n", 1, 0], [1574, "swissotel", "We have been for the first time in Chicago and stayed in the Swissotel for five nights,a wonderful place.Room was on the 29th floor,absolutely clean and nice and a breathtaking lakeview.Breakfast perfect and service really good.People were always helpful.It's a little bit far from Magnificent mile and the loop,but in front of the hotel there are buses (number6)waiting there next turn,not a real bus stop,but drivers are frindly and you can get on the bus.Next time going to Chicago we will again stay in the Swissotel. \n", 1, 0], [1310, "fairmont", "My husband and I were in the Fairmont Chicago recently for a conference. We stayed in a spacious suite. All amenities appeared recently updated and in excellent shape. The bed was very comfortable. Views were great. I love their products in the bathroom and used them in the pristine tub two out of three nights. The room was so quiet, it was very relaxing. We ate in the restaurant downstairs (Aria) and although pricey, it was excellent. The staff were consistently attentive and responsive. It is evident that everyone is very well-trained. I would love to stay here again. \n", 1, 0], [1248, "amalfi", "This hotel was great - In a great area right downtown and close to everything. The daily happy hour had great food, wine and premium liquors. The free breakfast was even better! Actually I believe everything was included breakfast/happy hour/business center/WiFi. Our room was a king size facing the back of the building. Really clean new and comfortable. Small touches such as books and cds to enjoy made the room feel less like a hotel - Would highly recommend. \n", 1, 0], [1296, "conrad", "I travelled to Chicago last week with my daughter for some Christmas shopping. We booked the Conrad based on the reviews on Tripadvisor. It lived up to all expectations. Great big room, with two king size beds. Very comfortable. Breakfast was great, loads of choice and plenty on the plate. Great location, connected to a shopping mall which was very useful the day it snowed. All and all, a great hotel and we would go back in the morning. Chicago is a great city with very friendly people. \n", 1, 0], [1420, "intercontinental", "We stayed here through Hotwire and got an amazingly low rate- $60 some odd dollars nightly for a 2 night stay last May. The room they had us in was small and had no view of anything except the wall of the other part of the hotel, but it was very clean, tastefully decorated and cozy. We had a great vacation, walking all over town until we ended up near the Planetarium which was where we then turned around and saw the skyline of Chicago and were just wow. So anyway, the hotel is great, the service was great, the room was very nice- I would recommend this hotel to anyone though I work at the front desk of a hotel myself and the previous person's comment about how she wasn't able to get adjoining rooms, well, internet sites don't guarantee things like that anyway- you've got to call the hotel direct and verify things like that. There's a note about that on internet sites as well- no room type/location is guaranteed. 5 stars out of 5 for this hotel. \n", 1, 0], [1587, "talbott", "My wife and I stayed two nights at the Talbott at the end of February. This little hotel was the perfect place for us. The lobby is very small but also cozy, and with both fireplaces going it was a welcoming atmosphere coming in from the cold. The staff was very friendly and efficient. The room was pretty spacious, and the king bed was extremely comfortable. We had a seventh floor room facing delaware st, so there was really no view. The bathroom was a good size, including two sinks and a spacious tub/shower. There was also free wireless internet...a big plus for us. Perhaps the best thing about the Talbott is the location. We were only a few steps from State, Rush, and North Michigan. Tons of shopping, bars, and good food are easily within walking distance. This makes the Talbott a great place for tourists who want to walk around and take everything in. We highly recommend the Talbott, and will gladly stay again on return trips. \n", 1, 0], [1332, "hardrock", "This is a great hotel, in a great location, in a great city !!! There's a cool bar area to the left of the main door when you can hang out and all of the staff are quite funky and look the part. The rooms are spacious and well thought out with a picture of some old rocker(s) in the bathroom ... I had the Beatles and although they're not my cup of tea, I was happy enough with George staring back @ me! The hotel itself is on the corner of Michigan Ave and a short walk will take you to the fabulous shops and restaurants ... try the \"Cheesecake Factory\" or have a meal / cocktail on the top floor of the \"John Hancock Centre\". A slighty longer walk (or a short cab ride) and you're at the \"Navy Pier\" - take a ride on the \"Seadog\" then enjoy all the fun of the fair ... or maybe a drink or two whilst listening to some great live music. This hotel (& city) is WELL worth checking out. \n", 1, 0], [1382, "hyatt", "We booked our room on Priceline, and got a good deal at around $100 per night. We stayed for the first 2 nights of our US trip so didnt use too many of the hotel's facilities The hotel is centrally located, just over the Chicago River from the shops at North Michigan Avenue, and around a mile from Navy Pier Our room was clean and comfortable, and on the 29th floor we had a good view of the city, and could just about see Lake Michigan (though the weather was very bad). The layout of the room is a little peculiar, with the bed facing away from the window, but over all we have no complaints about this hotel, and unlike some other reviews we were not disturbed at all by noise from other guests So, pros and cons: Pros: Helpful and friendly staff Clean and comfortable throughout Spacious rooms Large and airy public areas Starbucks and gift shop in lobby Cons A large hotel, so a long walk from the elevators to the front desk / lobby area \n", 1, 0], [1531, "sheraton", "I stayed for just one nite at the Sheraton Hotel and Towers and was a little nervous after reading a few negative reviews from other TA posters but I was not let down. I got the room via PL @ $70 and was first placed in a room on the 8th floor with a fabulous view of the roof of the lobby and a parking lot. Since I had nothing to lose, I asked to be moved to a \"room with a view\". The front desk attendant( Rasheeda) wanted to make sure that the room I had at first was clean and was in order and I assured her that it was. She then moved me up to the 24th floor with ease and it took about 1 minute. I was quite surprised as I have heard that they treat PL and Hotwire folks with a little less love than full price customers. The new room was very clean and spacious and overlooked the Navy Pier, a few other skyrise condos and the beautiful infinity of Lake Michigan. All this for $70? Yep! I skipped room service and walked to the local gourmet market as suggested by others and it was pricey but all food there was delicious! The room was comfy, had an ample closet and room to breathe as well as a convenient internet connection location. I didnt use it since I wasnt staying that long but at least it was on the desk. The bed and pillows were very comfy, but I awoke at about 330 in the morning sweating from the comfy but VERY WARM and somewhat weighty duvet on the bed. This was a great deal for the price and I would absolutely stay here again. \n", 1, 0], [1300, "conrad", "This is a superb hotel. The rooms are huge, including a luxurious bathroom. It is clean and service is first rate. Breakfast was excellent (and complimentary for Hilton Honors members). Hotel is in a good location, and is connected to a mall, which I imagine would be a great asset in the Chicago winter. Next time I go to Chicago, I will stay here for sure. \n", 1, 0], [1569, "swissotel", "I thought the Swissotel was a great hotel. The rooms were very spacious and clean, especially for downtown Chicago standards. Most importantly, the rooms were quiet. I never heard people in the hallways when I was trying to sleep. The only downside was that the beds were not anything special. Sure, like all hotels in Chicago, this hotel caters to wealthy and/or business clients with ridiculous minibar and parking price. However, if you are aware of that prior to arrival, its not a big deal (ie finding a different place to park the car, bringing our own snacks for the room). It would be nice though if hotels such as the Swissotel had a microfridge in the room for guest use. Staff was very helpful. Bellmen instantly got cabs upon request, and the front desk was efficient and helpful. Overall, if I can get a good rate again, I'll stay at the Swissotel the next time I am in Chicago. \n", 1, 0], [1511, "palmer", "My wife and I decided to spend three days in Chicago last summer, and booked via Expedia. When we first walked into the lobby we almost fell over at its' beauty. It's like something out of Europe. We were able to get a free room upgrade, even though the rooms are still a bit small, but its' an old hotel in an old city. It's there for sleeping and showering. The restaurants, lounges, and shops were all wonderfull. The next time we travel to Chicago, I'll be affraid to stay anywhere other than the Palmer House Hilton \n", 1, 0], [1589, "talbott", "We stayed here because of all the great reviews, and it's all true. We were highly impressed with the high quality of everything, everyone, and the location. Walking distance to much of what Chicago has to offer. Gibson's steakhouse and the Hancock building to name a couple. This hotel should really be in the top ten or even top five hotels for Chicago. It should also have more than three stars. I mean three stars is for the hilton garden inn or marriott courtyard, and this place far exceeds chain hotels like those. Depending on the room you get, any price under $250 would be a good deal. Between 250 - 300 could still be worth it. \n", 1, 0], [1308, "fairmont", "We went to Chicago to see an exhibit at the Art Institute and selected the Fairmont because it was so close. Although the lobby is still being renovated, our experience at the hotel was uniformly positive. The room was nicely sized and newly remodeled and immaculate. The only glitch involved getting the room coffee replenished. The maid does not do that, and by bedtime on the first night, we still didn't have coffee. We called the front desk and they immediately delivered a fresh supply. The restaurant is a little underwhelming, but with so many other places to go within a very few blocks, we probably wouldn't have eaten there any more than we did. After having stayed in close to a dozen different Chicago hotels, this may be the hotel we return to whenever we return. \n", 1, 0], [1586, "talbott", "We loved our stay at the Talbott. We were in Chicago to attend the theater show Dirty Dancing. We booked our room through Orbitz and received a nice discount. When we arrived at the hotel everyone from the doorman to the front desk to the maids were highly professional and courtesy. We were upgraded to a King bed suite. The suite was well decorated and spacious. My wife particularily enjoyed the heat that could be directed at the marble floor in the bathroom. We loved the hotel and will definitely stay at the Talbott on our next trip to Chicago. Highly recommended. \n", 1, 0], [1398, "hyatt", "Booked this on priceline for an insanely low price of $65 a night. The BF and I were amazed when we got there--the person checking us in was friendly and helpful to suggest some local nightspots and the room was gorgeous! A nice upscale, downtown feel and super comfy beds. We had a fabulous view from the 25th floor that inlcluded a sliver of Lake Michigan, a sliver of the Taste of Chicago crowds, and some friendly office workers in the builiding next door who waved to us a few times. Seriously. We had a pretty anonymous experience the rest of our stay--which was fine with us. The hotel consists mainly of 2 towers and is like a huge, sprawling city inside. But we weren't there to stay in the hotel room the entire time...we like to get out and explore as much as possible. The location was fantastic. Easy walking distance to Michigan Avenue and the rest of downtown. We walked for blocks well into the night and never felt like we needed a cab. I also highly recommend the Urban Cruise on the river (the entrance is right across from the hotel)--we saw some amazing architecture from the boat and got to cruise Lake Michigan a bit too. Don't park your car here if you don't need to--it's very expensive. Park downtown or ditch the rental car--you won't need it anyway, you can walk to tons of stuff or grab a cab. Love Chicago and totally recommend this hotel! \n", 1, 0], [1311, "fairmont", "Simply a nice place to stay... I had a great deal for the room, and was impressed with the quality. Hotel staff was very helpful; they were able to let me check out and helped me print boarding passes. Negative: It is frustrating that nowadays you do not have free internet in most hotels and it's the same here; you have to pay for the internet. Negative: Loud on the phone you may hear your neighbors on the phone, or them shower. \n", 1, 0], [1503, "palmer", "Had to bring my new puppy with me on a business trip and stayed at the Palmer House. The service was wonderful, staff was very friendly towards dog owners, even stopped to tell me how nice my dog was. Easy access to red line from Midway. Valets were prompt at retrieving car (they recommended calling down in advance we did and the car was there waiting). \n", 1, 0], [1480, "monaco", "We loved this hotel and would definitely come back. Initially we weren't given a goldfish, which was disappointing, but then we left a tip for the housekeeper, and she rewarded us with one. We had fun sipping wine and playing Wii in the lobby every afternoon. The staff were quite friendly and helpful, even printing our boarding passes for us. Our room was very comfortable, with a cozy little alcove at the window where we read the paper. At first we were worried about noise, since our room was next to the elevator, but we hardly heard it, and didn't notice any street noise either. The hotel is colorfully and tastefully decorated, well-lit, and ideally located. \n", 1, 0], [1305, "fairmont", "For the price of the Marriott we spent a night here ($122 + tax) and had an enjoyable if brief stay. As others have noted the hotel has been recently renovated, and the rooms are furnished with attractive and sleek scandanavian-type design. The staff was polite and attentive, and seemed to match the redesign with a hip kind of feel. The parking is pricey at $49, so I used an adjacent lot and self-parked, and as others have noted, the lack of water-pressue in the shower was disappointing. Good location. Would return, esp as this pricepoint. \n", 1, 0], [1267, "ambassador", "We just returned from 4 nights at the Ambassador East. What a gem! The location in the Gold Coast neighborhood is perfect for finding restaurants and walking the Magnificent Mile. There is a train station about 2 blocks away. The room was very comfortable, with nice amenities, and there is free Internet service on the 2nd floor. Best of all was the bell and lobby staff! They really went out of their way to be helpful and greeted us warmly each time we left and arrived. I would say that this was the nicest hotel staff I've encountered in all my travels. \n", 1, 0], [1429, "james", "took a weekend trip with my wife. got a great rate with valet included, paid a couple extra bucks for the larger room. staff was nice, workout facility was great. room has current decor, but was starting to show some wear. watch the concierge, she suggested a pretty bad restaurant to us. \n", 1, 0], [200, "hyatt", "I recently stayed at the Hyatt Regency Chicago Hotel, in downtown Chicago. During my three days there I experienced the worst service of my life! We made reservations before-hand and upon arrival our room was already booked. It took us nearly two hours to actually get into our room (After being given the wrong key!). When we entered the room, the sheets were stained with what seemed to be cherry kool-aid. I am going to assume that it wasn't. After a night on the town we were bummed for money by three homeless men outside the hotel. After arriving in our room and hoping for a nice hot shower, we found a note on our door with a \"sorry\" note explaining they didn't have any hot water. Early the next morning we were awoken by housekeeping (we had a DND sign on our door). So we decided to wake up and go out for breakfast. Comes to find out our car was broken into in their parking garage. We filed a police report and the police asked the managers for a video of the surveillance. Unfortunately for us their surveillance was out of memory to record anymore. Needless to say we left early the next day and I will never return to such a dreadful hotel ever again.\n", -1, 1], [325, "sheraton", "The Sheraton Chicago is not the place to be if you want to experience Chicago. There are no customer services to provide you with ideas of what to do, and there aren't even any shuttles that will bring you around town. The food in the restaurant at the Hotel serves mediocre burgers and fries, and makes no attempt to emulate the Chicago culture. There are a million other hotels in Chicago, and this is one of the most average. The rooms are fairly decent sized, but they lack amenities like wi-fi and mini bars. The view is nothing special, and the concierge is anything but responsive to phone calls.\n", -1, 1], [339, "sheraton", "I was sorely disappointed with the Sheraton Chicago. From the outside it looks like a great hotel, and I guess the inside was clean enough but the decor was really boring and frumpy, not what I expected when looked at the website. The front desk staff was nice enough at first, but when I asked for the wifi password they told me I had to pay extra. I mean come on, I'm paying over 200 bucks a night and wifi is EXTRA? The lady who checked us in got a little snippy about it and said it says so when you make the reservation. (Note to self, don't let your husband book a hotel without checking first about what amenities are offeredd.) So things started off on the wrong foot anyhow. I guess the positives for this hotel are the location and the lakeview (from some of the rooms) and it seems pretty safe. Other than that I was not impressed for the price - I've stayed in big city hotels for half the price that had better linens, a better restaurant, where they got your room cleaned up at a reasonable hour (we stayed two nights and we didn't get our beds made and fresh towels until almost 5). I guess the most unpleasant thing was the odd smell - not musty per se but maybe like chemicals they use to cover up a mildewy smell. In general it seems lke it's on the decline and the staff knows it, they're just kind of lackadaisical. I wouldn't stay there again.\n", -1, 1], [13, "affinia", "I recently stayed at the Affinia Hotel in Chicago, and it was one of the worst experiences I've ever had at a high-end hotel. I was in Chicago for a conference, and I thought I would enjoy the experience more if I had somewhere pleasant and relaxing to return to, but this hotel definitely wasn't that place. The restaurants were mediocre at best, despite their high prices; I repeatedly got food that was bland, overcooked, or lukewarm. The room was fine, but nothing special; I think I'd have been just as comfortable in almost any hotel in downtown Chicago. A big part of my discomfort and dissatisfaction with the hotel, though, was with their Jet Set Pets program; it's hard to find a decent, relaxing hotel that I'll like that will also accept my dog. But many of the employees were rude about my adopted mutt, who is energetic and loves people but isn't the most photogenic dog - he has a scar on his face and he's got that terrier look. Multiple people mocked him, or said there was no point grooming him, or asked why I wanted him sleeping on a bed in my room. I know that it's a fairly high-end hotel, but I would hope for better service regardless of the class associations of the dogs. I hope they at least treat all of the dogs boarded there well. The experience was overall frustrating and unsatisfactory, especially for the price. I can give them good marks on their spa services, and I really appreciated the pillow \"menu,\" but other than that it didn't feel like a particularly luxurious or indulgent experience, especially given the customer service.\n", -1, 1], [186, "hyatt", "when i first checked the hotel's website and reviews i was completely sure that it would be a great hotel and i would have a great time there. but i was totally disappointed once i got there, first of all i asked for a nonsmoking room because i hate the odor , and in fact they gave me a non smoking room which smelled worse than a smoking one, it was smelly in a bad way it smelled like sweat and dirty laundry or something like that. then when i was trying to enjoy the view, they windows were all dusty and dirty. so i decided to get out of the room , and i went to the pool and it wasnt what i expected either it has nothing to do with the picture . so i went back to my room and called room service for them to complain about the smell and dirt so they gave me another room which smelled even worse!. i was about to freak out so they gave me some deodorant and it was tolerable; the bed was uncomfortable and the bathroom eww!, its all i can say about this hotel.\n", -1, 1], [161, "homewood", "My stay at the Homewood Suites in downtown Chicago was without a doubt one of the worst hotel experiences in my live. I was there for a week long conference. Although my reservations had been made months in advance, they did not have a suite for me when I arrived, resulting in having to stay in another hotel for the first night. Once my room was ready, I was disappointed by the cleanliness and the limitation of the kitchen: barely large enough to move around, and very few utensils to cook with. The pool was only open for limited hours, and I should not have bothered bringing a swimsuit. At night I was kept awake by the noise coming from adjacent rooms and the traffic outside. My overall experience was a stay in an overpriced suite. I will not book here ever again.\n", -1, 1], [318, "palmer", "Our visit started off on the wrong foot when we entered the lobby struggling to carry all of our luggage and, instead of helping, a group of hotel employees stood watching and laughing at us. They had trouble locating our reservation. Our room was tiny! When I'm paying over $400 a night for a room, I expect to be able to walk around in it! The beds were also tiny. The walls were thin and we could hear our neighbors talking next door. This hotel was probably once beautiful and classy, but now it seems to be outdated and due for repairs. Won't be staying here again.\n", -1, 1], [215, "intercontinental", "My family and I were in Chicago for a friend's wedding. We had asked around to find a hotel that was nice, but affordable and were pointed in the direction of the InterContinental Chicago hotel. The hotel appeared very nice, and to have all the amenities: Room service, WiFi, clean rooms. Unfortunately, as it turned out, appearances can be deceiving. It begins at the desk, where the clerk was downright rude and uncaring. He said they didn't have any rooms available because we didn't make arrangements. It was getting late, and we had no place to go, there weren't any hotels nearby and my kids were starving. I asked if there was anything he could do, and he said that I will have to ask someone else because he was busy. I talked with his manager and after a bit of fussing, the manager apologized and moved us into a room for the night. Apparently, our expectations for what would be the normal amenities for a hotel stay was above standard, because this room wasn't even clean and the wifi didn't work. We ordered room service, and it never came, even after several complaints. It doesn't end there either; when we got home we found that the hotel had charged us for the room service. Overall, this was a very frustrating experience, and I wouldn't stay there again.\n", -1, 1], [357, "sofitel", "Sofitel not-so-luxury Hotels I recently checked out from a short stay at the chicago water tower. I originally planned to stay for a week but as my business was concluded after only 3 days I decided I had had my share of the water tower. Simply put it offered no reasons to stay. The Hotel is quite lovely and elegantly dressed to impress, but little more is put forth to sway the more acquainted crowed. The First night was a spectacle meal and there was quite a crowd, I think for the weekend. The next night the food was only mediocre and the third when I orderd room service I had to call twice. Even if you don't care about the food I think you would be wise to think twice about your stay if you have the choice. They put on quite a show, but that is all and when the show ended I was still hungry for more and there was no more to be found.\n", -1, 1], [263, "monaco", "I stayed here last August and I'm truly glad that I will never have to stay here again. The website does a great job of creating an illusion. The rooms are so much smaller than it seems on the website. I thought the Monaco was walking distance to a few nightclubs but it isnt. The wireless internet is free but it is extremely slow. For such a \"classy\" hotel, there isnt a pool. At $46 per night, the on-site parking is way too expensive for guests. All and all, I would not recommend this hotel to anyone.\n", -1, 1], [335, "sheraton", "I booked my room at the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers somewhat reluctantly; I was not enthusiastic about spending over $200 on this room after seeing the lackluster photos on their website. I was pleasantly surprised when I arrived that the lobby did not look as stuffy as it did online. Unfortunately, my hopes were dashed once again when I arrived at my room. I say 'at' because after discovering my newly issued key was not working, I had to wait ten minutes before someone finally came to let me in. The room was painfully small-- if I didn't know better I would have thought I was staying at a Red Roof Inn! The \"sweet sleeper bed\" had stiff and scratchy sheets, with a cheap-motel-thin coverlet. The disappointment continued after I entered the bathroom and found that it not only reeked of smoke, but also outfitted with the cheapest trimmings possible. I stayed my two nights, and was surprised to find out that all sorts of other charges were added to my room (for which I was not responsible), charged on demand movies, an empty mini bar, AND for smoking in the bathroom. HAH! I have stopped payment on my credit card, and most certainly will not be submitting myself to this horrific experience again.\n", -1, 1], [136, "hardrock", "While the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago promises upscale accommodations and a unique experience, they fail to deliver. Unless of course, a unique experience includes being kept awake all night by a party in the room next door. If you plan on staying there for a chance to meet your favorite celebrity or musician you will be sorely disappointed. The \"A\" list celebrities will not be there. In fact, it would be rare to find anyone on the \"B\" list either. The party that keeps you awake will not be your favorite band practicing for their next concert. The party is being held by the musicians that were not even able to gain work at a local coffee bar. The walls of the rooms are so thin you can hear every wrong note played. As for the promise of Art Deco, it must have changed in definition. Your room will truly look like a concert has just been held. The carpet smelled like it had been shampooed in beer. The bathroom lets just say that clean was not the correct description. Quality service and amenities were severely lacking. Guests are not greeted with warmth but with disdain. Do not bother complaining about the noise next door either. It is part of you unique experience. The only part of the Hard Rock Hotel description that appeared to be accurate was that it is in a great location in Chicago. It was easy to find a real hotel to stay in for the rest your trip.\n", -1, 1], [199, "hyatt", "I recently stayed at the Hyatt Regency in Chicago, IL, and boy was I surprised. The hotel looks nice from the outside but the smell from the river is noxious. In fact, the smell was so bad one night that it almost made it difficult to sleep or even think of eating. As if this were not enough, the bathroom of my room looked like it hadn't been cleaned in a month and their were stains on the \"fresh\" towels. Towards the end of my stay I saw a mouse on the ground floor and could only imagine what other critters may be lurking in the walls.\n", -1, 1], [16, "affinia", "There are many high-quality hotels in Chicago. There are many high-quality hotels on the magnificent mile and then there is the Affinia Chicago. With its neo-classical stylings and its non-classical service, it is just a combination for trouble, We had established our reservations for Friday the 15th amd arrived at 4pm to check-in. No Room. One hour after their posted check in time and nothing. No apology, no offer for upgrade, no discount. Nothing. As a seasoned traveler I have had my share of disappointments but this tops the list.\n", -1, 1], [205, "intercontinental", "I stayed at the InterContinental in Chicago for my visit to set up my Daughter's wedding. Nina (Our Daughter) stated this was the place where all the higher echilon gets hitched! Well I don't understand why at all. Upon arrival we checked in and met Nina at the \"The Bar\" (how innovative) and had a light supper. The food was like airline food and cold. The waiter was annoying and in your face when he could clearly see we were not ready to have our food taken yet. When he finally came with the check we thought \"our light supper\" was all too pricey. Then we were supposed to meet the sales manager Erin in the Lobby at 8:00 PM sharp. Not sharp enough. At 8:15 a worker came over to us and stated that Erin had an emergency and wouldn't be able to meet with us tonight. Well that is just great. Over $300 for a night and supper that would obviously be wasted. No more money will be spent here, I will Guarentee that. Sincerely Mr. and Mrs. Scott Grander Louisville, KY\n", -1, 1], [329, "sheraton", "I stayed at the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers in December of last year and had one of my worst hotel experiences ever. First, when I went to check in, I was completely ignored by the staff, they were rude and seemed to have better things to do than help me check in. When I got to my room, all the way on the 23rd floor, the room was dirty and had not been cleaned. So back down to the lobby and they seemed to feel it was no big deal and gave me another room. I went back to check and the new room was dirty also. There were pubic hairs on the bed and in the bathroom. It appeared the maid only went into the room and picked up trash and made the bed but did not clean. All I can say is YUCK! My next visit to the lobby the staff gave me an attitude about having to transfer me to another room AGAIN! Extremely poor customer service and gross rooms. I felt like I was staying at a $30 a night roach motel, not the $250 a night Sheraton. My advise is to stay away.\n", -1, 1], [347, "sofitel", "The Hotel Sofitel Chicago Water Tower bills itself as a 4-star luxury hotel, but the luxury is evidently in the eye of the beholder. Filled with trite modern art and modular, cheap-looking furniture that looks straight out of the latest Ikea catalogue, this 32-floor hunk of glass has to be one of the ugliest hotels I have ever seen. \"Urban chic\" design does not equal comfort; the seating and bed furniture are made more for the design floor than for actual use. Room service is expensive, slow, and the food you eventually do get is mediocre in quality and flavor. The hotel features two bars: the Cafe des Architectes Bar, and the simply named Le Bar. Cutesy French names and trendy modern outfittings do not a good hotel bar make! Excellent service, fair prices, friendly and competent staff are what make a bar great, none of which you will find at either of these bars. Cafe des Architectes is also a restaurant, offering \"seasonal menus featuring contemporary cuisine with French roots,\" which means small portions and large prices at questionable quality. Even the old standby filet mignon did not stand up to its reputation, coming out a little dry hunk of meat rather than a succulent steak. Pass this one by, if you're looking for a comfortable, enjoyable stay in downtown Chicago. The Water Tower is dry.\n", -1, 1], [139, "hardrock", "A few weeks ago we stayed at the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago. The hotel was a bust from the get go. As we arrived in the lobby, we had to wait several minutes for the front desk clerk to show up. (We could hear her talking in the back for 5 minutes.) When she got to the desk she was very short with us and not very helpful. We had to wander around the halls looking for our room. Once we got to our room, we thought the weekend was going to get better. The rooms are modern and nicely designed. That was about all that this hotel had going for it though. As soon as we started to explore the room more, it was clear this room had been a haven for a party a few nights before. The bathroom smelled of vomit and the bath tub had small shards or glass from broken bottles in it. We called a worker and they cleaned most of it up, but the thought of it still remained. As we all settled down to sleep, there were a few loud noises coming from the room next door. After about an hour, we finally made a call to the front desk to complain. The woman said that a rock band was in that room and they had just finished a show in Chicago. They were staying there the next 2 nights. I wouldn't recommend this hotel to anyone! It's a hard rock hotel all right. (At least that's what the beds feel like!)\n", -1, 1], [333, "sheraton", "I was recently a guest at the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers and was immensely dissatisfied. I arrived to find that they had \"lost\" my reservation. They told me they were booked solid even though I had produced my copy of the reservation confirmation. After nearly an hour of arguing with the front desk clerk she finally asked for the hotel manager to step in. He was almost helpful. He searched the database and found that there was a \"cancellation\"; however, it was not for the type of room I had reserved. I had asked for a suite as I was going to be staying in the hotel for several days. I was given a box with a bed in it. They made no apologies for losing my reservation and offered no alternate compensation. Unfortunately, I was in town for a conference and everyone in the area was completely booked. I had no choice but to accept what they had offered. I begrudgingly accepted this with the intention of contacting the corporate office and posting my review here. Do not stay in this hotel they will NOT help you with anything, even if it was their error.\n", -1, 1], [394, "talbott", "I was going on a 3 day personal trip to Chicago, and I decided to indulge myself a bit this time around. I chose to stay at the Talbot, an upscale hotel in the heart of downtown Chicago. To start off, I was NOT pleased. For the hundreds I pay a day, I expected an impeccable hotel. First, the check-in process was bad as somehow it took them nearly 15 minutes to find a reservation I had placed nearly A MONTH in advance. Some customer service they claim. Next, when I went to my room, I found that room service had not cleaned it at all. I was forced to wait as they called up a maid to entirely reclean the room as it was strewn with used towels and such. In summary: yes, it was a fancy hotel, yes it had nice accommodations, but the service I experienced there was simply not up to par with a hotel of that price.\n", -1, 1], [6, "affinia", "My wife and I stayed at the Affinia Chicago last week (in a studio suite, which was NOT worth the extra payment). It was an absolute NIGHTMARE! To begin with, the room is listed as 'oversized', when it's nothing of the sort. We've previously stayed in the hotel and the regular guest room is only about 2 square feet smaller. I believe the only extra space was in the closet, which isn't very useful unless you plan on living there! We had our two sons with us, so we had to make extra sleeping space. Our oldest son slept on the couch and woke up multiple times in the time, complaining of bugs moving around. He must have been umcomfortable also, as I sat on the couch during the day and it was like a rock. The room service is horrible, they took 47 minutes to deliver a pillow for my wife around 10pm, and she had to wait up for that. My family would NEVER go back to this hotel, and I highly recommend you also stay well away.\n", -1, 1], [62, "ambassador", "The Ambassador East is a particularly crappy property, given the numerous quality hotels in and around the Gold Coast. Unfortunately, I saw an amazing rate and decided to book -- this experience will be a reminder that you get what you pay for. While the lobby was gorgeous (and appears to match the photos on the website) the room I was assigned was run down, and looked nothing like the photos posted on the website. It looked like someone had put a quick coat of paint on the walls, but the furniture was old and the fixtures in the bathroom were rusty. The room also smelled of must or mildew. While the room did have air-conditioning as advertised, it was an in-window unit that sounded like it was on its last leg. I was only here for a single night, but had I been here for anywhere longer I would have requested a refund. Please, if you're staying in this part of town, do yourself a favor and book at any one of the numerous other properties around here. The Hampton Inn and Hilton Garden Inn are both nearby, clean, and often have special-offers -- these aren't the only properties in the area, but both of these will save you a potentially unpleasant stay.\n", -1, 1], [330, "sheraton", "I stayed at the Sheraton Chicago hotel for a business meeting and had an absolutely horrible experience. When i arrived, exhausted after a series of delayed flights, I was told that my room was not ready. Not ready at 5pm, are you kidding me! After waiting in the lobby for 30 minutes I was finally called over to the desk only to be told my king room was changed to a room with two queen beds, fine, whatever. I get up to my room and unload all of my bags only to find my a/c doesn't work. I call down to the desk and the clerk tells me that they are sold out and there is no where to move me but she could discount my rooms $20. No apology. Nothing. Im exhausted and deal with my 80+ degree room. When I went to check out the next morning I find out no one even bothered to apply the discount. Again, no apology. I have never received such poor customer service in my life and will not be comming back.\n", -1, 1], [303, "palmer", "When I first made reservations at The Palmer House Hilton, I was excited because of all the gorgeous pictures displayed on their website. Little did I know it was going to be a total disaster. First off, my husband and I couldn't find the place. It was our first time in Chicago after all. And when I would call for directions, they just kept putting me on hold. When my husband and I finally arrived, the bus boy was extremely rude. After man-handling our luggage, he held his hands out impatiently expecting a tip. Talk about arrogant. The front desk clerk was a little too pushy. My husband and I were only staying one night just to attend my sister's wedding, but they kept trying to up-sell a suite when all we needed was a regular guest room. The room itself was okay, decorated so ornately that they are forced to jack up the price and take all that you're worth. They even had the nerve to try and say that we purchased some items from the \"snack bar\" and ordered a movie that I've never even heard of! Completely unprofessional. I will never, I repeat, NEVER stay at this hotel ever again.\n", -1, 1], [267, "monaco", "I found my stay at the Hotel Monaco - Chicago to be less than satisfactory. They lure you in with a fancy website, promising the world and more, but their services and amenities turned out to be a facade. The pictures on the website show a grand five-star lobby and one would assume the rooms match, but when I received my room (which by the way I could barely afford) I found it to be no more luxurious than my local Motel 6. They mention that they are \"pet friendly\". Let me tell you, that is code for \"smelly\". There was a faint urine smell throughout the entire hotel and I was awake all night because of the incessant barking. Would not stay again.\n", -1, 1], [164, "homewood", "I stayed in the Homewood Suites in downtown Chicago last week, and I was extremely disappointed with my experience. The breakfast buffet was minimal and did not seem to be frequently restocked. I came downstairs about 30 minutes before the end of the breakfast period to find about half of the food options completely depleted. Also, the milk provided for the coffee and cereals was warm, having been kept out on the counter. I would have been better off bringing my own food! Also, the layout of the rooms is extremely awkward. I had to move the furniture around to be able to watch TV, and then move it back before I could make dinner or comfortably use the room in other ways. I could barely close the door to the bedroom past the corner of the bed. It just wasn't what I would expect from a Hilton-brand hotel suite.\n", -1, 1], [258, "knickerbocker", "I had wanted to stay in this hotel since I had heard about how historic it is and I was highly disappointed with my stay there. The room that I was given was dirty and when I went back to the front desk to inquire about it, they disregarded my concerns. It took them a very long time to get me a new room and they whole time they were very unprofessional and did not make me feel welcome. I did not stay in the hotel all night since the people in the rooms around mine were unruly and were making noises all night long. I left that night but not before demanding a refund.\n", -1, 1], [124, "hardrock", "This was my first time staying at the Hard Rock hotel in Chicago and I have nothing but hate for the entire experience. The building itself is maintained, however the staff is rude and inept to the point of making their customers feel physically ill. And while the outside appearance is fine and dandy, my room 325, was repulsive. As soon as the bellboy threw my luggage onto the room's ground and verbally demanded a tip, I noticed insects of all kinds scurrying around, the room was pungent with what smelled like human excrement, before I could say anything to the bellboy he had taken his tip and fled. Immediately I went to the front desk and was made to wait for over a half hour, a complete waste of time, because as soon as I had reported my problem I was told that no other rooms were available and I would have to make do, they did however say I could stay the night free of charge. The next morning as I was set to leave I decided I would try the breakfast, in hopes of finding one redeeming quality. Let me tell you, that breakfast tasted like space food with dirt and mold, the worst breakfast I have ever had in my entire life. Overall the employees are arrogant and callous, with the work ethic of a 2 year old child, they cannot cook, the room for me was poorly maintained, however they are good at refunding your money.\n", -1, 1], [203, "intercontinental", "The Intercontinental Chicago Magnificent Mile The outside of the hotel itself is as the name says is pretty magnificent despite being set in what has to be the filthiest section in the city. For the cost of the rooms starting at 179.00 a night, you would think they would have a competent parking attendant. I was delayed from a very important client due to a latency issue with my reserved room, and if that was not enough. To top it off the room service had the nerve to bring up room temperature pasta and a bottle of champagne that had the seal previously broken free of the cork. Needless to say this will be the last time this hotel ever is to grace so much as another dollar bill from my account. I would highly recommend another hotel with better accommodations.\n", -1, 1], [55, "amalfi", "I needed to find a last minute hotel to stay in for the night so i came to this one. First of all the prices for one night are extremely high. The workers at the front desk were not kind at all and treated me like i was a second rate and not on their list of priorities. Then i got into my room and got settled and it smelled of cigarettes and the air conditioner was making loud sounds so i didnt get much sleep. Also the restroom was very dirty and frankly disgusting. The beds were very old and uncomfortable and the tv did not work at all. Overall i am very disappointed with this hotel.\n", -1, 1], [2, "affinia", "I recently stayed at the Affina Chicago hotel and was really dissappointed. When I arrived, the desk clerk was really slow checking me in. I feel like turtles could have checked me in faster. I was finally checked in and my room was on the 8th floor. The elevator ride seemed to take forever. I arrived and the room and at first glance it looked great, but after looking everything over there were finger smudges on the glass table. I figured maybe room cleanin must have accidentally touched it. I went to the C-House for supper that evening and I had to wait for what seemed like forever. The meal was good, but my waitress was very uptight. On my way back to my room, I asked the front desk to set up a wake up call for 6 AM the next morning and they were very grateful to set that up. It would have been nice to actually get it though. The next morning I surprisingly work up at 7:18 AM and realized that I had not received a wake up call. I was very upset and let them know. Overall this experience was not worth the 4 stars that this hotel has been given. For the price, quality and ratings the Affina Chicago hotel has been given, I would expect better service.\n", -1, 1], [32, "allegro", "My wife and I recently stayed at the Allegro hotel in Chicago and were extremely disappointed. It claims to be a luxury hotel, but the air conditioning in our unit wasn't working and the ice maker in refridgerator was unbearably slow. We phoned in these issues to the front desk and the person on the other end assured us these problems would be taken care of. Noone ever showed up. Aside from that, there were so many kids running around we couldn't think straight. This is just my two cents, but I'd would tell anyone considering staying at the Allegro to pass and look at their other options.\n", -1, 1], [173, "homewood", "I recently stayed at the Homewood Suites by Hilton Chicago Downtown, and found it lacking in the quality of their service. The rooms are nice and well furnished, but the service lacks in some areas. Some of the complimentary services include fast-speed wireless internet access, cardio-fitness and indoor pool, grocery shopping service and coffee, tea, hot chocolate or cider all day long in the lobby's 24 hour convenience shop. However the wireless internet was spotty at best with really slow speed at times, the indoor pool was far to cold in my opinion and the cardio equipment was left uncleaned. The grocery shopping service was alright, although a bit on the slow side and then finally the coffee and hot chocolate in the 24 hour convenience shop were both cold and overall of poor quality. Rating this Hotel on a scale of 1 to 5, I would give it a 3 at best.\n", -1, 1], [61, "ambassador", "The Ambassador East Hotel is a terrible place to stay. All of the rooms are old and dirty as though they haven't been cleaned or remodeled for years. The hotel staff is not friendly or accomodating. Do not waste your money in this crappy old hotel full of rude employees.\n", -1, 1], [306, "palmer", "My stay at The Palmer House Hilton was less than satisfactory. I would have expected much for from such a \"high end\" hotel. The rooms were way over priced, and the service was less than satisfactory. At one point, I left my dirty towels on the floor to be picked up, and when room service came through, they were still there! On the other side of things, the cup I had left on my desk (which I was planning to use later) was gone. My coffee and my towels were also never replaced. I also was astounded that internet service did not come with the price of the room. Rather, it was a \"nominal fee\". After paying so much for a room, I had hoped to at least have complimentary wifi. My stay at the Palmer House Hilton left much to be wished for. I will not be staying there again.\n", -1, 1], [84, "conrad", "This hotel is rather far from the airport and in traffic it took almost 2 hours to get there. By that time, I was so tired I was just ready to check in to my room. I stood in line forever as there was only one person working at the front desk. That was only the beginning. It was very noisy outside from people constantly walking around. I guess it's because they're located in the middle of the downtown area, but they could at least make the walls thicker. I don't want to hear everything going on in my neighbor's room. The bathroom was not very clean and one of the towels had a hole in it. The toilet ran all night which kept me up along with all the people on the street. The restaurant food was horrible and I would rather buy food from a street vendor than to pay the ridiculously high price they charged for a burger. Overall, I was very disappointed with my stay at the Conrad Chicago.\n", -1, 1], [961, "homewood", "Stayed for a week last month. Can't beat the location - close to the Magnificent Mile, Attractions, Tours, Great Restaurants & Night Life. Have spent a lot of nights in other Homewood suites hotels and other suite hotels. Thought the room was ok, not great. Overpriced in my opinion. Found staff to be uninterested and not very helpful. Had to wait in the lobby on the 6th floor for room to be ready and the front desk staff could care less. Watched during the week as other guests were made to wait as well. Breakfast was the same stuff day after day. As the week went on, they actually started to run out of the more popular food items and these were not replenished (weekly delivery I guess). Also, the room was was so busy that the staff made people wait for a table and treated you as you were waiting for a 5 star restaurant. Travel for work (sales) and frequently stay in hotels. Travel with family every year and also stay in hotels. This is roughing it for me...not a camper. Would come to Chicago again, but would not stay here. There are too many other options worth investigating.\n", -1, 0], [871, "ambassador", "I can see how this place must have been gorgeous at one time but they really need a makeover. 1. There was a huge gaping hole in the carpet on the bedroom floor. I kid you not. How can they have guests in a room where the carpet looks like it had been mauled by a giant earthworm? 2. The furniture was severely chipped. Ok. I dont mind chipped furniture if I am slumming it in my just-out-of-college-sister's apartment. But for 170+ a night, I want a room that does not look like it was furnished with stuff retrieved from a dumpster drive 3. The receptionist while I was checking in was super curt. I know it was late but isnt that sort of your job? Not everything was horribly bad though. The one star is for the bathroom that was super clean. I do not recommend this place at all.\n", -1, 0], [1178, "swissotel", "My husband and i made a reservation for 2sure nights but decided to stay just the second night. I called the hotel and spoke with Eric, he quickly canceled my reservation and i asked if we would be charged for thd cancellation, he said no and that was the end of it. My husband then remembered we needed to cancel from bookit.com as well. I called and they said the hotel wouldnt authorize a cancellation per the terms and agreement. I informed courtney from bookit.com that i specifically asked if we would be charged and i was told no by Eric. She spoke with the mgr Erica and she said Erica would honor that if i could provide a name. I got his name and callex back and he told the bookit consultant that he \"didnt recall\" saying that. I was so furious that i called him on 3the way with the bookit consultant and he just lied!!!!!!!!!!! He said, no ma'am i dont remember saying that. I said so since you dont remember thats it??? I said my husband heard him say it b/c he was on speaker phone since we were driving on the way there. I asked to speak to Erica, told her the situation and she said she cant go off of heresay and couldnt honor what her employee screwed up on. I asked him nicely to please tell the truth and he just would not tell thr truth. I have never writte. A review for a hotel before but i am going to go out of my way to make sure corporate sees this. Erica was very unprofessional and cared more about not taking sides than she did about making sure the guests feel welcome. VERY DISAPPOINTED!! WILL NEVER STAY AGAIN!!\n", -1, 0], [1050, "knickerbocker", "I stayed here for 5 nights last summer. I booked the reservation on priceline for $75/night which was the cheapest rate I could find anywhere during a convention week. Anyway, when I arrived at 11 pm from the airport, I was told that they had overbooked the hotel and had no room for me. They booked me at a dumpy 2 star motel by the airport. They gave me $20 for a taxi to get there, and it cost me $35. I was late for a meeting the next morning because of the extra travel and packing/unpacking. The Millennium offered no compensation whatsoever for their foul-up. No free drink, no room upgrade, nothing. Since I booked on the internet, I was chopped liver. Beware.\n", -1, 0], [967, "homewood", "While the parking service was great - the front desk was terrible. We had a huge problem getting ice one night - we had none in our room so we went twice to get some - no one was there to help, called the front desk they promised to deliver some - none arrived so we called again - they said we had to come and get it and would not listen to what we had to say about what had already happened. ...read more\n", -1, 0], [1196, "talbott", "I have stayed in the Talbott a few times and had always liked it. This time was my first visit in 2 years and I was disappointed. The hallways are now looking tired and the carpets need to be replaced. I had asked for a corner room but instead was given a small and very dark room looking out onto a wall 10 feet away with multiple noisy vents immediately outside the window. The lights had to be kept on throughout the day even through the days were bright. The bathroom was tiny and would be difficult to manage with 2 people in the room. The AC unit rumbled on permanently with background white noise even when switched off. Having stayed there before I know there are better rooms but this one was the same price as the others I have been in and the risk is getting it again. Other small things contributed - the lobby brownies are no longer, there were no cup lids for the lobby coffee (so you couldn't walk out with the coffee) and I got a newspaper only on the last morning of a 5-night stay. The construction noise was not too bad but does start at 7.30am and goes on until around 8pm, including weekends.\n", -1, 0], [1067, "monaco", "First let me say, the front office people at Hotel Monaco are wonderful and the location of the hotel was just what I'd hoped. There are some other problems; the furnishings are quite rundown, and housekeeping wasn't very helpful. We booked a suite and the sofa bed, chair and coffee table in the living room area had all had some very hard use. I've attached pictures, so you can see the considerable gap in the sofa and the lack of pillows. Comfortable it was not! The chair bottom is all broken down too. I invited one of the Assistant Managers to view our furniture, and a slight adjustment was made in our rate. As to housekeeping, we had ordered an in-room coffee service (which Kimpton's web site says is there, but you have to specifically request) and at no time did housekeeping leave us coffee. We had to call the front desk every day. And, housekeeping neglected our fish and on our next to last day we found it floating dead at the top of the fish bowl. I had requested water be added to the bowl when I noticed it going down and my note was disregarded. These things may not matter to you, but if you plan to spend a week, like we did, you might want to be comfortable. The bedroom and bathroom were superior; just the living room was bad.\n", -1, 0], [889, "conrad", "Booked a room w/ a queen bed for 2 nights for a wonderful NYE, and was rather disappointed. Bed was either the world's smallest queen, or was actually a double, not to mention it was uncomfortably springy. Some of the things in the bathroom had been previously opened and used (q-tips). Lots of noise seemed to carry through the vents as we could hear other rooms rather clearly. When the tv was off, there was a very audible high-pitched humming noise that we could not get rid of unless we unplugged the tv. Hot water was very inconsistent in the shower. It is in a great location, however, next time I will try one of the other hotels in the area like the Intercontinental or Marriott. This might not be too bad if you are passing though quickly on business, but I wouldn't recommend it for a romantic night or two.\n", -1, 0], [877, "ambassador", "When you're standing in a craptastic excuse for a shower buttnaked and cold with soap in your hair because the water from the shower head has gone from a weak spray to a dribble to nothing coming out at all, nothing in the world will ever convince you to stay here again. The worst part is that the hotel knows this is a problem (they told me that it happens to the upper floors, and I wasn't even staying on the highest floor!) as if that makes it ok. I can look past the \"rustic\" decor of the room and take it for what it is - an inexpensive place to crash, but c'mon, a girl's gotta shower.\n", -1, 0], [922, "hardrock", "Went there for business and the Hard Rock Hotel on Wacker Drive was recommended. I was to meet my girlfriend there who had arrived 1 hour before me. When she go there at 6PM, the room wasn't ready, the phone didn't work, the shower didn't work. When I got there she was already very upset. I called the manager to complain, but was put on hold for 30 min. I could hear everything in the room next to me as if there wasn't any wall separating us. I asked for a wake up call, but nobody called me the next morning. When I called to complain the next day, the told me the phone system was down. Ordered room service and got the wrong order... The building is very old and the elevator sounds like it is on its last breath... I would not recommend it to anyone Patrick\n", -1, 0], [1049, "knickerbocker", "I booked a hotel room for 4 nights at this hotel through an online vendor. After booking the hotel room I contacted the hotel to request a room with 2 beds. I was told in 3 different conversations with hotel personnel that I would have a room with 2 double beds. When I arrived I was given a King sized bed and was told that there was nothing the hotel could do for myself and my 3 guests. Apparently the hotel management saw no problem with 4 people sleeping in 1 bed. The staff was completely unaccomodating. To add insult to injury we met other guests that had obtained a room with 2 beds by just walking in off the street the day after we checked in. I would not recommend this hotel to anyone. The customer service is well below what is acceptable. The location of the hotel is great but there are many other hotels that offer excellent service and high quality rooms to stay in while visiting Chicago. Bottom line is do NOT stay at the Millenium Knickerbocker!!!\n", -1, 0], [1102, "palmer", "First of all, Expedia.com charged me for an additional person per my instructions but when I arrived at the Hotel these monies were not included and the complimentary breakfast was not offered. The Hotel service person who checked us in forgot to give me back my parking ticket but left a generic message for me stating that there was an envelope at the front desk. I had to wait in line for another 20 minutes to discover this the whole time this person was looking at me and never said a word!! I was charged and paid for parking adjacent to the Hotel. When we went to leave the gate would not open. We had to find the parking garage office and the Manager had to call several times over to the Hotel until finally someone picked up. They confirmed my payment and then we were allowed to leave the structure. The Hotel itself is beautiful!!! The bell hops and doormen were just wonderful. They were more than helpful and gracious but the internal staff were rude and not helpful at all!!!!\n", -1, 0], [815, "affinia", "me (taking a cue from david dancer): 'sup? front desk person: yes? me: so, do I have to wait in the elevator line to get up to my room? front desk person: what room are you in? me: **** front desk person: oh. ...i'm afraid so. OR, you can take the other elevators and take the fire stairs up to the 10th floor. me: oh? wtf! so, we're staying at this hotel, and there is a bar on the 29th floor, but we have to wait 15 minutes in line to get to our fucking hotel room? get bent! we're paying to stay here, not just drinking in your bar!\n", -1, 0], [962, "homewood", "Upon first entering the hotel, we were greeted by the most friendly and helpful bellmen I have ever encountered. Through our 2 week stay, they told us to \"have a nice day\" as we left in the AM and welcomed us back upon our return. Breakfast is served in the AM, and the servers were as delightful as the bellmen. It was a very enjoyable stay.\n", -1, 0], [1173, "swissotel", "Swisses Chicago: Nice, but lacking in some pretty basic expectations in our modern era in a great spot along the Chicago waterfront. A spacious room is a comfortable respite from the city, but don't plug in your computer or hope for a free donut in the morning. No free WiFi here ,or affordable breakfast, or a free swim in the pool. Just a ten-dollar-a-night charge for internet, an on average $25 plate for breakfast, and another 15 bucks a night for the \"fitness center.\" I've stayed in small town no star motels where WiFi is free as part of a 50 dollar room. Get with it - this is 2009! No free breakfast is not so bad as you probably ate too much for dinner and don't need it anyway, but for those of us who aren't charging everything to the company card some basics would be appreciated. Coffee, milk, OJ; stale donuts, ,muffins, maybe some cereal. Throw us a little something besides fruit flavored water in the lobby. With regards to swimming, this is another one wrapped up in a fitness center fee but the pool is only open till 10 pm plan accordingly. This all makes the $6 Fiji bottled water in the room seem like a bargain. Summation: Drop the fees, the nickel dimming of folks, and just charge what you need to charge to compliment what is otherwise a nice hotel.\n", -1, 0], [973, "homewood", "I called on December 6th, 2010 at 3 p.m. to book a room for an upcoming weekend getaway, and was taken aback when the phone was picked up and promptly hung up without a word. Thinking this might have been a simple mistake, I gave it another try. A woman introducing herself as \"Toni\" answered the phone, rushed through her introduction, sounding incredibly bored and annoyed that she had to answer the phone. Barely letting a second go by after her introduction, she gave a snotty \"Hello?!\" before I could open my mouth and tell her \"Never mind.\" Never has a hotel answered my call so rudely. I'd like to give the hotel the benefit of the doubt and pin this unpleasant experience to \"Toni\"; however I will not be calling back again in hopes to stay at this hotel during this trip.\n", -1, 0], [880, "ambassador", "The Good - excellent location, neighborhood is pretty and quiet, close to shops, restaurants, the waterfront, close to train/subway station, etc The Bad - Very old decor, which isn't a big deal, but the tv was smaller than my PC monitor. We were supposed to have a king bed (anniversary trip) we were given two double beds and told we would be switched - that never happened. The shower/tub was stopped up so bad that after I showered my husband waited over one hour for the tub to drain before he could shower. Who wants to shower in someone else's dirty water even if it is your wife. The indifferent - room was a decent size, bed linens were okay, staff was mediocre to marginally rude\n", -1, 0], [911, "fairmont", "My family of four went to a convention and stayed here in early August. We were promised a room with two double beds. When we arrived (earlier than most) we were told they were 45 double beds short. We reluctantly agreed to take a room with a king bed and a promise of a roll away bed. We had a to sleep very uncomfortably with a 12 year old in our bed and our other child in the roll away. Little did we know we were being CHARGED a daily fee for this bed. The managment could not handle the large group that was at this hotel. The bellhops and bartenders were visibly stressed and we did not have towels one day until very late at night. The managers would not take off the roll away bed charge and were not the least bit accomodating. We were so disappointed in this hotel. Also, they do not have a pool here. If you want to use a pool there is a health club next to the hotel but you have to pay $20 a day to use it. $80 for a family to take a little swim was a bit ridiculous. Do yourself a favor, if you want to be accomodated and are thinking of booking this hotel for a convention or otherwise, go elsewhere. Chicago has too many hotels to choose from to pick this one. I never heard back from managment on this issue when I called and emailed so obviously they don't care, even when I told them I'd write a review on this website. Chicago is an awesome city though. We loved it!\n", -1, 0], [1165, "swissotel", "Three nights there on business. Hadn't realized that the place was under construction and therefore the bar and restaurant are in the basement, very bleak. Told the front desk that I hadn't realized about the construction, so I'd have to switch hotels, they said they were still going to charge me for 3 nights. So I stayed. TV didn't work. Tried to get them to fix it and they ignored me...eventually after I called again, a few hours later, a couple grumpy maintanance guys came and fixed it. Long and complicated experience at the business center (which doesn't open until 9am, BTW), where I ended up paying $45 to print 55 pages. Had to buy these cards, and then the woman behind the desk ended up printing them herself anyway, (and charging me for them). I was left with $22 on a card for use at the business center in the basement of the Swissotel in Chicago, 2000 miles from where I live. I asked for a refund on the card and -- no surprise -- she declined to help me with that. Nice room, nice view, but the hotel is sterile and the service was incredibly bad. Worst experience I've ever had at a hotel when traveling for business.\n", -1, 0], [1183, "talbott", "I am not much of a complainer, as you can see when reviewing my other posts on this site, but the Talbott provided such bad service that I feel the need to warn future travelers to Chicago: My girlfriend and I stayed at the Talbott for 2 nights in late July 2006. The first sign that something was wrong come during the initial booking of the room over the phone. The receptionist was outright rude, but took the reservation without a mistake. During our stay the hotel and restaurant staff was extraordinary incompetent, the waiters, the managers, nobody was friendly, nor tied to accommodate us. [------------------------] We and many others who stayed at the hotel attended a wedding reception close by and had arranged the hotel bar to remain open from 12-2 to have an after hour's party. The hotel manager had assured us that this was secured and done in the past upon such occasions. When we returned from the reception at 11:50pm the bar was closing and the night manager and hotel staff were very rude to me and my friends. \"Nobody told us, we can't do anything for you.\" \"Are you sure that you arranged this?\" Two quotes so typical for this hotel's staff that I know that I will never stay at this hotel again. I understand that mistakes are made and that communication can be difficult across different shifts in a hotel, but blaming the customer so being confused and failing to arrange what I know had been arranged for and was later confirmed by the day staff is too rude even for my taste.[-----]\n", -1, 0], [935, "hardrock", "My wife and I just spent a long weekend at the Hardrock Chicago hotel, and although I am not one to normally write long email, I felt it necessary to bring some of the disappointing experiences from our recent syat (2/14 to 2/17) to your attention.Issues included: Our friends ordered chocolate covered strawberries to be delivered to our room upon arriving on 2/14 and we never got them. Our friends later (on 2/16) asked us if we had received the strawberries, and we responded no. They then brought this to the attention of the hotel and we were pleasantly surprised to have received a complimentary bottle of champagne. We were then disappointed again, upon checking out, however, when we were accidentally billed for the \"complimentary\" champagne - which was later subtracted from our bill. The in-room DVD player didn't work. It was approximately 11 PM on 2/15 when we called the front desk for help with trouble-shooting the issue. The person responded friendly that \"Al, the engineer, will be calling you back shortly\" to help. 10 minutes later there was a knock on the door, and it was Al. A great and friendly guy, but we were waiting for a call back, not the arrival of a service tech - keep in mind it was late and we were already in bed. When Al was not able to fix the DVD player, he graciously told us \"order a movie on us\" - thru the in-house movie selection. The problem: that didn't work either. Again, Al was awesome, and called the service provider, but they weren't able to fix it until after midnight. Finally, after midnight Al called us back, but by then the \"movie watching\" mood had sort of passed. I ended up watching the film \"Hitman\" alone as my wife had already gone to sleep.The thermostat in our room didn't work, regardless of the temperature we set it to (set to 65 degrees - actual temperature = 76 degrees). We had so many other unresolved issues that we didn't feel it necessary to voice any more. ...read more\n", -1, 0], [972, "homewood", "While it was a nice hotel, but i am rather frustrated with them! During our stay our room was cleaned twice by housekeeping. The first day was fine. Second day my diamond earrings came up missing. Noticed they were missing while in the packing up and checking out process. My biggest mistake was not staying there and dealing with this further. But we had a family reunion and funeral to get to. While the front desk was great and said they would handle it, I believe they say these things just to get you to go on about your way! We filed a police report and the GM of the hotel is supposed to be working on it. We have called several times but receive no answers. They keep telling us the cleaning staff have been there 10 + years.....that dosen't matter to me! If they are not held accountable what's to stop them from taking anything. There is a dishwasher in the room, and they found my daughters ring (which was in the same glass with my diamond earrings) in the dishwasher. They say I put the cup in the dishwasher. First, I am on vacation, trust me i'm NOT doing dishes! Second, why would I wash one glass and leave the other dirty dishes in the room? So, while it is a nice hotel....lock up your things of value! They may come up \"missing\" and you'll be left frustrated!!\n", -1, 0], [1171, "swissotel", "We stayed at the Swissotel for a three day weekend, and were disappointed to see the construction when we arrived. Is it just me, or is this information not clearly stated on their website? A giant tarp where a lobby should have been was pretty weird and unwelcoming. The room itself was fine. More bland and generic than the \"European elegance\" claimed on their website. The lack of hot water, was definitely not fine though. There were a couple pluses to our stay at Swissotel. The location is good, the bed was comfortable and the room was clean. These few good points certainly did not redeem our experience, and I wouldn't pick this place again, even post-construction.\n", -1, 0], [1048, "knickerbocker", "While this is a good location for shopping and sightseeing, I would not recommend this hotel to anyone. The rooms are small and bathrooms are tiny, all of which is to be expected in an old urban hotel, but apparently care has not been given to updating the hotel (ever!). The crown molding and base boards are cracked and it appears to only have been painted over and over again. The newer tub liner in the bathroom is merely floating above the old tub and when you stand in the shower it bubbles under your feet. The shower tiles are old and the grout is not clean. This hotel has not been restored the updating that has been done are merely band-aides. There is no fan exhaust in the bathroom and the carpet is ontop of a very hard surface, probaly concrete with no pad in between. The lobby is smokey because of the large open bar in the small space. We were in town on business and supposed to stay 4 nights, we left after 2 and went to another hotel.\n", -1, 0], [927, "hardrock", "at check in, the girl gave us a smoking room. we asked for nonsmoking. i had to get another room. it was by the elevators. loud! really loud!. the new room didn't have a shower door. so every day water spilled on to the floor and wet the carpet. the public transportation is amazing. you don't need a car in chicago. you can get anywhere by train or bus. it's fast too. Area recommendations chicago is great! good shopping, good food (ginos east!!!) and great bars. the tornado that knocked out the windows in the sears tower was really cool! i loved being in the hardest rain storm i've ever seen!\n", -1, 0], [848, "amalfi", "I was really excited about staying at the Amalfi after reading several reviews online. Unfortunately, it was a very disappointing experience. When we arrived, we were told that there was a mistake and the hotel was oversold. So, we had to move to another hotel. Amalfi did take care of the other hotel, cab fare, and after much negotiating...breakfast. We were traveling with 2 children and all of this was very inconvenient. Instead of getting up the next morning and going to the museum as we had planned, we had to get up, pack up our suitcases, check out of the hotel, take a cab, check back into the Amalfi, only then could we head to the museum. We were also told that our first night's stay would be refunded. Well, more than 3 weeks and 3 phone calls later...there still hasn't been a refund. I can't even get a manager to call me back. The Amalfi wasn't all bad, it is centrally located close to train and bus stops and has many restaurants within walking distance. The coctail reception had a nice selection of drinks and appetizers. However, it was in a very small room and there was no place to sit both nights we attended. One reason we picked the Amalfi was that it had 2 queen beds instead of doubles, but they seemed really small for queens. Our view from our room was of the alley. So, overall the best part of staying at the Amalfi was the night that we were sent to another hotel and had a wonderful view of the city from the 22nd floor. Very disappointing indeed!\n", -1, 0], [1194, "talbott", "I booked two rooms four months in advance at the Talbott. We were placed on the top floor next to the elevators, which are used all night long. When speaking to the front desk, I was told that they were simply honoring my request for an upper floor, which I had requested for a better view. I am looking at a brick wall, and getting no sleep. He also told me that they had received complaints before from guests on the 16th floor, and were aware of the noise problem. Why then did they place us on this floor when the hotel is not totally booked? A request for an upper floor does not constitute placing someone on the TOP floor and using that request to justify this. If you decide to stay here, request a room on a lower floor and away from the elevator! I spoke at length when booking my two rooms about my preferences. This is simply poor treatment of a guest whom they believed would not complain.\n", -1, 0], [1082, "omni", "The Omni was chosen for it's location whichworked out perfectly. The bedding was wondeful and everything seemed fairly clean ...until...I sat down in the tub...there was BLACK MOLD in the soap holder, in the cracks on the walls between the tile, all under the tile overhang above the tub and completely around the toilet bowl. Needless to say I drained the tub and took a shower...I really don't care for showers. Oh yes...the toilet leaked as well...The staff were very helpful but I was disappointed. I travel extensively and don't think I will return. we needed color copies for a business meeting and their printer was broken, so the man in the business center took the jump drive to another part of the hotel, printed the presentation and delivered it to our room. They try! We booked online for a weekend package and got a room on the 10th floor with a view of the windows of another building...but we weren't there too much.\n", -1, 0], [945, "hilton", "I checked into this hotel, Rm 1760 on 11/13/2010. Next day, I woke up with bed bug bites, numerous, on my arm and back. We reported this to the management who assiged us to rm 1901 and promised to get the room inspected and \"taken care of\". I insisted that they get all my clothes laundered, which they did. Interestingly, no one from the management, other than the security guy who came when we first complained, even offered any apology for the inconvience. I missed couple of meetings that day. The next day, I called as I forgot something in the previous room, only to discover that the room was already assigned to the next guest. So much for reporting!\n", -1, 0], [898, "conrad", "I travel to chicago quite often, and have stayed at a bunch of hotels. I stayed at Conrad a couple of times. My impression was not too good. Both times the receptionist was quite cold and I didn't feel welcome at all. The room was noisy. Thin walls, and you could hear exactly what the next room is talking about. One time the tv was broken too, and a guy came in and took like an hour to fix it... Anyway, given that this is a 4.5 star hotel, it really didnt live up to my expectations. After the 1st time at this hotel, I thought I might give it a second try. After the 2nd time, I decided I am really not coming back, especially given that there are so many other hotels close by. The other attendees of our conferences were also complaining about the hotel. So I guess I am not alone in this...\n", -1, 0], [1045, "knickerbocker", "Just returned from a one night stay at the Knickerbocker, and I will not return. It came nowhere near being worth the price I paid. Hotel Burnham is twice the hotel at half the price! The bathroom was unbelieveably small and smelled terribly. We had to call the front desk twice before towels that we requested were delivered (which frankly may as well have been paper towels, nothing plush about them at all). We didn't have enough pillows and when we requested an extra it was never delivered. Room service cart was left outside our door all night. All in all, it was a very disappointing stay. The only redeeming quality of this hotel seems to be its location. And for me, it's just not worth it.\n", -1, 0], [838, "allegro", "As a frequent traveler to Chicago, I generally stay at the Sutton Court, but thought I would try a different boutique hotel. I will never stay at this hotel again. The first room they brought me to -- their standard room -- was a glorified closet, leaving me absolutely claustrophobic! Actually the smallest hotel room I've been in in the U.S! I complained to the front desk, who then moved me to a \"premium\" room -- still quite small, but manageably so. The bathroom was tiny, without a vanity, making it difficult to put your toiletries in the room. The location leaves much to be desired, as my room looked out directly onto the El (elevated subway - background noise), and the street was pretty deserted on a Sunday evening. I will say that the free wi-fi was great. If you can find a chain or other hotel closer to Michigan Avene, I'd highly recommend you take that. If you want a nice room in a great location, check out Sutton Place hotel instead.\n", -1, 0], [852, "amalfi", "I booked this hotel for a business trip since I was able to get a $129 rate on Travelzoo and figured I'd save my company some money. I had also read excellent reviews on TripAdvisor. I had a guaranteed and confirmed room reservation for two nights in November. When I arrived in Chicago at 7:30pm I decided to go to dinner prior to checking in so called the hotel to request a late check in and was told \"no problem.\" When I arrived at the hotel at 11:45pm I was told they didn't have a room for me and that I'd have to move to the Four Points Sheraton which they paid for. It was a major inconvenience to have to move and completely unacceptable that my confirmed room was given away. I was told that they overbooked and didn't get as many cancellations as they expected. I did check into the hotel the next day and once there did have a good experience. I would recommend staying here but do ensure that your reservation is indeed confirmed and avoid any late check-ins or you might not have a room! The \"experience designers\" were great and very helpful. The rooms were very nice and comfortable (felt like home). The breakfast could stand to add on some bagels for the \"healthy factor.\" It was nice that they did have fruit. I think that once the kinks are worked out that this will be a great hotel--they just need to get the basics down!\n", -1, 0], [801, "affinia", "We stayed 2 nights over spring break in what was called a Jr Suite but resembled a wide hallway with a window at one end. Bad cheap furniture, carpet that stops short of reaching the wall, a TV that sticks out into the middle of the room and a window that whistled when the wind blew. BAD BAD experience. Find aother hotel plenty in the area.\n", -1, 0], [1187, "talbott", "This is a great hotel but there is no way that I would recommend it until the construction around it is complete. The elevator is the alley starts for the construction site behind at 5:30am and goes on into the night. Dumpster filling and emptying also seems to go on 24/7. Worst of all, the restaurant is open to the sidewalk cafe here and the rats go scampering from the construction next door to street to grating. Ugh!\n", -1, 0], [999, "hyatt", "This hotel is very busy and is operating way beyond their means. Incompetent service. Hotel ran out of hot water by 9am saturday. Elevators were very slow, waited 10 minutes on any given event. Red line trains ran every 10 minutes beneath city streets and you can hear the thunder in your room from them but it shouldnt keep you awake at night. Used my stay toward NW airlines bonus points. Bar was ok. One cup coffee service was awful. No free wireless and no free cable channels. Fridge was 25 bucks a day to use. With http://hotels.com res got it for 65 bucks with tax so what can you expect.?.... Location was superb and cab service was convenient but not enough to outweigh the negatives.\n", -1, 0]]